This week's generous sponsors are
Mild white fish (grilled)
Taylor and Clark provide further demonstrations on their
Handspun yarn takes up less space than fiber, right?
It started when I realised that even when I'm alone in the house, I'm the unhappy victim of all manner of interruptions.
As a little girl I would sit near the kitchen door while mother cooked and we would play antakshari (a game of songs). And I would read out poetry and passages from my favorite book. In the summer vacations mother and I would take the train to visit my grandmother. Those were our times alone spent trying to discover each other.
“BlueScope Steel is the perfect sponsor. They’re supportive and always engaged with the students and the Conservatorium, but not in any way demanding or interfering. They trust that the Conservatorium staff will always do their best for the students, and they allow us to do just that.”
Can’t you see there’s no place to go
Whether or not a private citizen should have the right to bear arms in public spaces and if so, what regulations should be in put in place to protect against the misuse of firearms.
but I WILL NOT.
Too often, as women know, history books typically focus on wealth and power, those narratives told and driven by men. Women, confined for centuries to domestic or religious life, often seem almost invisible.
Blanch asparagus until just tender. Remove from water, shock in cold water, and cut each stalk in half. Place in a serving bowl. Add cherry tomatoes and dates.
So their advertisements are populated with a never-ending tide of giggling mouth-breathers who bray until blue-faced at anything bearing even a passing resemblance to wit. The message is simple: there is never a single second spent at The Olive Garden that is not the best goddamn second you've ever spent on Earth. I'm left with the impression, however, that if an actual joke were ever told inside an Olive Garden, every customer would erupt with laughter until blood geysered from their mouths and they fell facedown into their troughs of Endless Butter Sauce.
Magnesium’s role in stabilizing blood vessels is well documented, helping to prevent capillary and muscle spasms. Increase magnesium-rich foods such as wheat germ, garlic, oatmeal, seafood, kale, broccoli, spinach, melon, bananas, basil, cantaloupe, blackstrap molasses, and nuts to support the body and prevent migraine pain.
The distant traveler in anticipation waits
This post is sponsored by Tempur-Pedic, the brand millions of owners trust to deliver their best night’s sleep every night. Enjoy our Buy 2, get 1 free pillow offer now and give the gift of custom comfort to someone you love.
David Jay: bass guitar
bead scatter
7-703E Powder Blue
And then there's the basic inconvenience of French websites. The French don't know how to construct websites that actually work. B.A.D.
I wanted to shine light on the shadows inside your heart
19. Propane tent heaters are also also God. My parents are keeping us well supplied with those little camping propane tanks.
I tried again. Babe...
finished within about 8months!
Tell the truth.
Matolas- A matola is like a commercial pick-up truck or that type of thing. We usually avoided them like the plague because they weren't cheap and usually extremely uncomfortable. We had two especially bad experiences. The first was just after we'd hiked Mt.Mulanje and were nice and clean from swimming. We got on the back of one and were literally covered red dirt from head to toe by the end. Even though we covered our mouths with clothing, we could still taste the dirt!
All of us grownups know that high school is as painful as it is fun, and Jake’s experience has been no different. He excelled in theatre. He became a “rowdy teenager with a lot of friends” who loved to hang out together downtown. His teachers loved him. They praised his contributions to class discussion and his writing. But homework problems and sleep difficulties dragged him down. Clinical depression and conflicts at school made 17 (which I fondly recall as one of my best ages) a rough year indeed for Jake. He transferred out of an environment that was becoming toxic for him–not my choice but one which I have come to believe has been best for him. He walked bravely into an enormous public school, made friends, passed his classes, and got into a program that accommodates his desire to get out of high school and on with real life sooner than his peers.
Results:
X. X-Rays you’ve had: Just went to the dentist and he did an x-ray on my jaw
I'm surprised at how nasty some of the posts on Facebook have been about Madonna's halftime performance. Not from my real friends--you know how you accumulate those Facebook friends that you don't really know? To them I say... what exactly is your talent again?
** This Bread is not a discussion about the assurance of salvation, whether a person once saved is always saved. I for one believe that when God calls us, we are in fact called and when God saves us we are in fact saved, no matter what we do. However, I also believe that effective calling, saving faith, a circumcised heart, a transformed life, and good fruit go hand in hand and where one is missing, there may be a good argument that the others are missing as well. But that is not my concern; God will judge His own (and everyone else) in His time.
Place foil-wrapped salmon in the boiling water and allow to simmer on the water for about 8-12 minutes depending on type of fish and fillet size. Fish will flake with a fork when cooked through.
Throughout the year I have ben trying to figure out the best thing for my students to do when they finish their work. I usually had them choose a book from the library but then some were reading. While others are constantly up to get a new book. So over the last week I have put up two file folders on my board with extra work. They know that if they finish their work they may go choose something from one of the folders. The work that I put in the folder is usually something that we would have done but didn't have enough time for.
Forrest Parker was recently the Executive Chef at Gaylord Opryland, the 17th largest resort and convention center in the world. As Executive Chef, Parker created a new culinary concept for the property in early 2010, transforming a 25 year old establishment from Cascades Seafood Restaurant to Cascades American Café. When historic floods in May of 2010 devastated Nashville and closed the property for many months, Parker was a leader on the small team that redesigned the property's kitchens, menu concepts and restaurants. He executed sanitation training for more than two-thousand employees, and once again trained a new culinary team to finally re-open Gaylord Opryland in November to high acclaim and record profitability. Not satisfied, Parker then went on to conceptualize and help launch the Opry Backstage Grill, an Opry themed and branded restaurant that is to be launched throughout the Southeast. A celebrity chef in his own right, Chef Parker has been featured in a variety of publications including Santé, the Tennessean, Nation'sRestaurantNews.com, the Nashville Scene, Hip Compass Escapes magazine, the Murfreesboro Post and on WSMV-TV among others. He is the only Tennessee chef to have placed in the top three in the National Pork Competition and has taken top prizes twice in the Tennessee Pork Association's contest. Chef Parker previously studied at the College of Charleston, pursuing a degree in classical studies and worked as a licensed tour guide for the city of Charleston, S.C. The fire for food was ignited when he began cooking for the James Beard Award-winning chef Louis Osteen at his Charleston restaurant. And under the close tutelage of Sous Chef James Clark, he learned all stations in the kitchen. It was here that Parker's education and career came full circle. He enjoyed the opportunity to cook with (and for) some of the greatest chefs in the Southeast, such as Elizabeth Terry, Frank Stitt, Mark Militello and Robert Carter. Parker went on to become Restaurant Chef at the 4 star, 4 diamond Soaring Eagle Casino's Siniikaung Steak and Chop House in central Michigan. He opened the award winning Siniikaung Steakhouse, re-inventing classic steakhouse fare with a contemporary and seasonal touch. He then went on to work at the Mystic Lake Casino in Minneapolis, Minnesota, as the Restaurant Chef. He managed teams of more than 100 and also taught culinary classes ranging in topics from regional American foods to Asian street foods in order to expand his team's knowledge and capability. Additionally, he completed wine studies at the Culinary Institute of America, Greystone in Napa Valley. He joined Gaylord Opryland as Executive Chef in 2007, overseeing the elegant DiRoNA and Wine Spectator recognized Old Hickory Steakhouse, Cascades American Cafe and multiple other outlets with a P&L responsibility of more than $20 million. Chef Parker worked diligently with corporate partners to highlight sustainability in an economy of scale.
Dana Hall is situated in the town of Wellesley, Massachusetts (a city with a population of around 30,000 that is also home to Babson College and Wellesley College), which puts it in close proximity to Boston and gives it a unique combination of a small town feel mixed with a metropolitan air. (Like I said – it’s a unique setting and I firmly believe that you have to actually go there to get a true sense of what I’m talking about.)
Original Air Date: Mar 30, 2012
I may go with the flow, but I don’t necessarily get it started. I’m not a brilliant visionary full of creative ideas, but when you include me in your vision; I’ll work hard to help you bring it to fruition.
What inspired you to start making music? What is your own musical background?
The most common style is brut -- there is an extra or ultra brut, but you'll rarely see it, especially in the U.S. Brut has 0 to 15 grams of sugar per liter. Then comes extra sec with 12-20 grams, sec at 17-35, demi-sec at 35-50, doux at more than 50 and also extremely rare. You're usually dealing with brut style in this country, and it's a versatile wine for meals, desserts or just quaffing.
But it’s not feline. It’s based on Aviator Snoopy. I like Charlie Brown, don’t get me wrong. And I like his dog. But Snoopy the dog has nothing to do with Catwoman. So there’s that.
Many people have asked me whether I will continue blogging when I leave Paris. I'm flattered. Truly, it amazes me that there are people out there who read my work with their morning coffee. I cannot thank you enough for your encouraging comments and messages of support.
Oh, you're still here? Well, in that case, allow me to direct you to this post and ask you kindly to vote in the latest Fun-Time Hall of Fame poll - currently featuring the Cleveland Indians of yore. Thanks!
I think I nodded. At least, he seemed to understand me.
warming the tears that poured from eyes
They rule over everything that swims in the oceans.
To do otherwise is to incarcerate the human mind -
A few years ago I’d visited the French literature section of the library to track down a novel by Joseph Kessel (so few of whose works, alas, are available in English). I located it, but simultaneously my eyes spotted a brightly decorated spine the next shelf over. Stretching to pull it down, I barely avoided having it bean me on the head. On the cover a folkloric floral design accompanied the curious name “Panaït Istrati.” Intrigued, I turned to the preface, written by…Joseph Kessel. This fascinating piece of
That's because it's a technique which combines most of the craft techniques we've explored in these Tuesday posts on this blog.
I'm tempted to get one of those shelf things to put the spices on instead of the containers. That way I can see them all and just pull what I want out instead of pulling the whole basket out. We'll see, though. I do like having more cupboard space for the spices, though!
So, I asked my boyfriend Dean to share his story on why he decided to take on his first marathon in 2010.
This book is also the KING of cliffhanger endings! I cannot believe what just went down, and I am literally freaking out about it! I demand a 3rd book! NOW, Ms. Roth!
Reyneke said the syndicate would then "pick up" a homeless person or prostitute, lure them to their vehicle, "make them drunk until they pass out" and then remove anything which could identify them.
Not even a nearly fatal car accident in 1982 could stop Teddy from pursuing his music and touching millions with endearing hits like "the Gift Of Life", "I Can't Win For Losing", "Close The Door", I Can't Live Without Your Love", "Joy", "Turn Off The Lights", "Love TKO" and "Voodoo" among so many others...
Mark Hughes was not best pleased with the officiating in his comments afterwards but he was not half as infuriated as Wigan manager Roberto Martinez. In a match that will set his hairline back another couple of inches, Chelsea managed to scrape a 2-1 victory with two offside goals. Branislav Ivanovic was in a different postcode to the Wigan defence when he stabbed home the first before Juan Mata grabbed late winner whilst also in an offside position, albeit a slightly less obvious one. Martinez called the decisions ‘disgusting’ and blamed the bewildered Dave Bryan who was running the line.
delusion, the fusion of broken illusions
Dogs do posses emotion but they are not as complex as humans. Dogs sense our emotions, but do not read the negative energy in the true meaning of emotion. A dog will read negative energy (emotions) as a weakness and react accordingly. Dogs rely on their instincts, they will be happy when their instincts are fulfilled and sad when their needs (instincts) are not being met, or if they are ill. Dog’s respond to the moment they don’t sit and worry about the past nor have complex thinking for the future. A dog will not sit at home when the owner is away planning revenge that the owner has left them their alone, but a dog will take the opportunity to get into mischief and have some fun. Dogs are opportunists and just reacting in the moment.
Anyway, I can't really repeat the recipe on here, but made these beautiful brownies from (yes you guessed it) the Hummingbird bakery cookbook. I made them to take to a friends on Weds night and they're the best I've ever done brownies. I was goinf to make cupcakes but I had little time and you can just more or less throw all the ingredients in a bowl and go with this one. No creaming eggs and butter, piping, injecting etc.
1) Preheat oven to 350 and set out one frozen pie crust.
It’s a tiny one-roomed establishment with an U shaped bar and lots of mirrors. The atmosphere was great – mainly because we were with friends and had a laugh – and it has a fantastic juke box too.
Heat up pot and put in the olive oil. Sauté the onion in the hot olive oil until fragrant. Add in the potato and carrot. Add water just enough to cover the potato and the rest of the ingredients. Thicken the stew with a little corn flour and water mixture.
We had a few clues that made us think we were dealing with this issue:
The team selections promise to be more interesting than those declarations. Di Matteo has said he won’t take any account of Saturday’s FA Cup final when naming his team for tonight, which is admirable and/or reckless of him considering that Kenny Dalglish surrendered three points at Anfield last night by sending out the stiffs against Fulham. Pardew, meanwhile, will make a adjustment at right-back, as Danny Simpons misses the game through injury and is replaced by Jamie Perch. Pardew may have some tactical tricks up his sleeve after accepting the blame for Saturday’s 4-0 mauling at Wigan – ” Tactically, we made mistakes as a coaching team (at Wigan). The psychology of the team and the tactical side of things is my responsibility, and I felt that I let the club down a little bit as well. On Wednesday, I have to make sure I don’t get that wrong.” Word is he might switch back to 4-4-2, which could herald a return to goals for Demba Ba.
Frank Rich was on Tavis Smiley's PBS show a few weeks ago and he asked Frank Rich if he thought that White America was ready for a Black FAMILY in the White House. For a Black First Lady, and two little Black kids running around the White House. Frank Rich looked surprised by the question and admitted that he hadn't thought about it in that way. I thought it was a terrific question.
These journaling pieces were then stuck down using regular matt gel medium.
So I have this friend from high school, her name is Kelsi, and honestly, we're like twins. We come from really similar families and we just happen to have a lot in common. And when I say a lot, I mean a lot. During our senior year of high school, in our math class, we wrote out this list of everything we have in common. And here it is!
such a supportive group of people. ¬_¬'
We returned on Sunday, and I was delighted to discover I’d been summoned to jury duty again in two weeks. Wheeee!
They should be thoughtful and nicely wrapped.
A couple weeks ago we my kids and I went on a trip to Aiken, SC (my hometown) to go to the Christmas Parade. On our way there are many fields of cotton. Most of the cotton had already been harvested (which means the stalks aren't as pretty)....but there was this one field. We were late on the way, so I wasn't able to stop, but I thought I "might" stop and do a drive by picking later in the afternoon. Christmas parade was great, bla, bla....as the day wore on, I couldn't stop thinking about how the cotton would "make" the decor this year. Just little touches here and there.
It was the first career walk-off hit for Jackson, who bailed out the Tigers after closer Jose Valverde blew his first save since the 2010 season by giving up two runs in the ninth.
I can remember one of the first times I ever had Nutella. My stepdad is German and he brought it into my life when I was about ten. For that I will forever be grateful. We were taught that it should be spread on white crusty rolls or thick rye bread - but only on top of a thick layer of salted butter. I figured my mom must be in love with the guy if she was letting us eat chocolate and buttered bread for breakfast, but as a kid I knew better than to bring that up. Just eat the Nutella and smile.
Now we get into some of the photo sleeve pages of the album. Along with the photos of downtown Alaksa, I have a title block at the top & a journaling block at the bottom to give some of the details of the day. This is a theme I'll uses throughout the book.
end tables
We ate here twice.
Well, we're all cranked up for the next launch, around the end of May if things stay on-schedule. Spent the last two days debugging the telemetry tracking antenna I normally run, and learning more about it, and it's history, than I knew before.
you are in. You will not remain in this
Agatha reaches up and taps the side of her head “I don’t lose a thing” she then sits next to Moskk, who sits at the end of the long table.
The 6oth surprise birthday party was for my father-in-law and turned into a very late night 3am to be exact.
Overall, the website is professionally done; not only about the looking –colors, layout, picture, and so on- but also easy guidance and description of the company.
Sent: Friday, May 04, 2012 10:55 PM
-strategy
He also delivered a rare prime-time televised address in which he assured Americans that the U.S. role in Afghanistan is shrinking while also promising long-term aid to the Afghans. “I recognize that many Americans are tired of war,” Mr. Obama said. “But we must finish the job we started in Afghanistan and end this war responsibly.”
I’m going to be generous and give you 521 words.
I suppose the word "fan" originally came from the word "fanatic". But since the meaning of the word "fanatic" is so extreme: (a holder of extreme or irrational enthusiasms or beliefs, especially in religion or politics) I am glad that my husband just considers himself to be a "fan" of the San Francisco Giants.
"Everything," she said and forced the blade into her neck. Blood. So much blood. "Everything." She dropped to the ground, mumbling "Yellow and red. Yellow and red."
In those old days, they cooked in the kitchen with a big kettle, that always hung over the fire. Every day they lit the fire and added things to the pot. They ate mostly vegetables and did not get much meat. They would eat the stew for dinner, leaving leftovers in the pot to cool down overnight, and then start again next day. Sometimes the stew had ingredients from many days before. Hence the rhyme; "Peas porridge hot, peas porridge cold, peas porridge in the pot, nine days old."
Admirers cite different reasons for loving the work. For me, it’s the pure audaciousness of the projects. Big, beautiful, and impossible not to notice. As simple as child’s drawings, yet so complicated, and so amazingly, incredibly original.
Camaro 73443 NT 30 Dato (Stardust) - Heuerville: "It was Jack Heuer who was the driving forced behind the design and production of the Camaro. Despite the name, he commented recently that the watch had no commercial connection with the American muscle car. Sadly, the Camaro range was a short lived, only being seen in the 1970 to 72 catalogues."
Where do we find the time to manage it all? Why do we feel the need to say yes so often? Even more important, what do we truly give up when we say yes?
And so much more.
Consumer behavior has changed tremendously after the digital revolution. The way today’s consumer is shopping online (at least in India); this wasn’t the scenario a decade ago. Consumers today are highly engaged, they are keeping a tab on the latest offers, deals & discounts more than ever before.
*James is currently in Costa Rica with the soccer team. I am really not sure what to do. I ordered Cafe Rio online (during my lunch break) so I could pick it up on my way home. I watched 4 shows (while grading of course... when do I ever just watch a show/movie?): American Idol (x2), Greys, and Vampire Diaries.... and I don't really know what to do now! haha I better figure it out soon James doesn't come back to the states until July! (He'll be in Russia most of the time).
Last night, Rep. Louie Gohmert (R-TX01) gave a floor speech where he discussed the “disappearing language” since the 9/11 Commission Report, which was replete with hundreds of references to “Islam”, “jihad”, “Muslim”, etc., to the complete disappearance of such terms altogether in the 2009 FBI Counterterrorism Analytical Lexicon and the 2009 National Security Strategy documents.
To handle the massive imaging data load, that’s why.
For the past few years, I have hosted a Christmas Cookie Exchange for my friends and family. Even though the party is always on the 2nd Sunday of December, I still like to send out Save the Date invitations in late October.
“I have come that they may have life, and that they may have it more abundantly.” (John 10:10 New King James)
Friends, I have been away for a long time now. It's been about a month since my last update and I've been sitting and trying to figure out what exactly I wanted to do with this here blog. When I first started blogging, I loved it. It was a great hobby and fun and I was "introduced" to a lot of fun and creative people. Apparently my social awkwardness spreads across the internet though, because while I have a few "e-friends", I don't have many. This is fine, but I thought reaching out, meeting people, and networking would be so much simpler with this blog, and it's not. It's just as hard as in real life. Plus, to have a successful blog, one needs to be super marketable, creative and skilled. I am barely any of those things (Mostly creative. I've never been good at creating or thinking of neat ideas to create/do/etc., as for marketability...I'm just really awkward). Popularity doesn't interest me so much but I would really enjoy it if my blog were read widely. (I'm sure we all wish that sometimes though, don't we?)
How does an adult explain politics to a three-year-old?
Take my yoke upon you, and learn from me, for I am gentle and lowly in heart, and you will find rest for your souls. For my yoke is easy, and my burden is light.” (Matthew 11:29-30 ESV)
A track from the early 1980's and recorded at the Radio Mali studios in Bamako. This is in fact a medley of donso n'goni songs, made popular by the great Toumani Koné. It starts off with Zani frantically setting the pace in a tune known as "Dangoroba". Flani is singing the lead, with Sidi* Touré backing him. After 1'24 the band seamlessly moves into what is probably "Gon Magni" (see 5), followed after 2'40 by "Noumouna Kouloumba". Note how Zani uses the guitar to imitate the shooting of a rifle (e.g. at 1'45). After 4'22 wanders off with a solo that illustrates his fantastic rhythmic skills, as he meanders around the main rhythm but always gets back on the right spot. The medley ends with a version of "Baba", a track covered many times by other artists (in various forms).
It’s just an old house. Old houses creak. Hector wasn’t scared. He was thirteen now, not a little kid.
Place shrimp into the pan, and then sprinkle on the seasonings you have just blended together on the shrimp. Mix the shrimp, margarine, and spices until the shrimp is coated well with margarine and shrimp. Bake for approximately 15 minutes, remove shrimp, and check for doneness. The shrimp should be pink when done.
The first one away from family. In Chicago. I made my mom's cornbread dressing and took it to a big potluck hosted by some dudes living in a crazy house in Pilsen. The dressing was unevenly cooked--done around the edges, mushy in the middle. My boyfriend tooke a mincemeat pie from the grocery store. We all drank a lot, got loud, and had a blast.
4. While muffins are baking, place 1/4 cup of melted butterin a bowl. In a separate bowl, mix together 1/2 cup of sugar with the cinnamon. Remove muffins from their cups, dip each muffin in the melted butter, and roll in the sugar-cinnamon mixture. Let cool and serve.
That's one of the (many) problems with prologues. When you query with pages, start with chapter one, page one. Leave OUT the prologue.
Meei-Ling Ng: 215-606-8428
Consensus: Kill Bill: Volume 1 shows Tarantino in top-form with a style that is bloody, violent, vicious, and shows every single one of his influences in a way that not only shows what he loves but also creates a wholly original flick on its own. Definitely can’t wait to see Volume 2.
Autumn even got in on the fun. I made sweetened whipped cream to top a couple of the pies and threw the disposable piping bags in the trash when I was done. When I wasn't looking Autumn stuck her snoot in the garbage and started licking the cream off the bags! My mom caught her in the act so I snapped a few pictures of her. She looks quite pleased with herself :-)
I have to admit, I’m not sure Rey Sanchez would make my own personal Notorious Mets list if someone else were writing it, but he ranked highly for several Mets bloggers and on several lists so I felt compelled to include him. When I asked some bloggers for blurbs as to “why” though, I had a feeling about the reason, but perhaps Charlie Hangley, concerned Mets fan and blogger over at Mets360, summed it up perfectly in one word: “Haircut.”
(Don't you love happy endings?)
“Working with French estate agents can be challenging,” she says with a laugh. “They seldom share listings and many don’t speak English. Plus, they represent the seller, not the buyer or the renter--and so their goal is to obtain the highest price. Having us represent you creates a better balance.
Not a great way to start the day. But now that I know Mr8 can get ready in five minutes, our mornings are going to be very different.
RGIII will be a legit quarterback for a long time, but they didn’t pick any other players capable of contributing this year, and I thought they should’ve taken a safety in the third round that could rotate in.
Ella’s Carlo suspected that Ella was either married or engaged. Carlo couldn’t seem to fathom that it was a possibility that Ella could genuinely care for him and fall for him for real to the point that Ella would risk almost anything for Carlo. Carlo’s focus was more on the financial side and he seemed to have a ready wall as well regardless of the existence of his bar girl Ella in his life.
Defamation is an act of communication that causes someone to be shamed, ridiculed, held in contempt, lowered in the estimation of the community, or to lose employment status or earnings or otherwise suffer a damaged reputation. Such defamation is couched in ‘defamatory language’. Libel and slander are subcategories of defamation. Defamation is primarily covered under state law, but is subject to First Amendment guarantees of free speech. The scope of constitutional protection extends to statements of opinion on matters of public concern that do not contain or imply a provable factual assertion.
“… because if you remembered I probably would have been thrown off a metaphorical cliff and onto a pile of broken glass. Don’t give me that look, you’re never happy when you realise that everything can be overridden. Just go about your day. Keep calm and carry on, I believe the saying is.”
Something to remember is that these chemicals are all designed to kill living organisms, none of them are good for human ingestion. Since pool chemicals are not designed for human consumption this is not normally an issue. I have many of the same warning I gave in the first article about pool chemicals and drinking water. Even if the active ingredient is necessary for disinfection, the lower grade of chemical, usually around 30%, means that 70% of what you are adding to the water is unknown. That lack of information is and should be unsettling. Again ANSI/NSF 60 is the standard for drinking water chemicals, you can order this grade for your pool. The hypochlorite I use in my water treatment plant has pool instructions printed on the containers. If you are a prepper and have a pool I highly recommend drinking water quality disinfectants. You will always have a fresh supply, and none of the worries with poisonous chemicals when you are dying of thirst and you have 10,000 gallons in your back yard.
I had never said these three words before and I had never heard these words before. That’s not the kind of thing you said OR heard anybody say in my house. My parents never said such a thing to me, they didn’t even say it to each other for that fact. I just knew I wanted to hear it AND I wanted to say it……but I didn’t have anyone to say it to. Intellectually, I knew you had to feel something first, but what would that feel like?
Baby Milk Action has sent the following letter to the authorities who have separated Habiba from her daughter claiming that breastfeeding is "chaotic" and "damaging".
You can never have too much white serveware in my opinion.
At The Precipice
Not to be outdone, three days ago The London Stock Exchange Group announced it is in exclusive talks with LCH.Clearnet Group regarding a p a majority stake in the London-based clearing house. This give the LSE more downstream control of transaction, and would also make the LSE a bigger competitor against the omnivorous NYSE Euronext axis.
“How long do you plan on searching for her?” Luk asked. “You’ve already scaled the Towering Mountains, the first man to accomplish such a feat, scoured most of the major cities on all three continents, and even succumbed to walks around Crystell Castle on your sleepless nights.” Luk scratched the back of his head. “I never thought that a woman leaving her man so abruptly could have such an impact on him.”
4. Monthly Behavior Calendar - It looks like a regular old calendar, but in every Friday box, there's a spot for Parent Initials. I would jot a note when a student didn't turn in HW, didn't complete class work, had a behavior issue, etc.The behavior calendar was expected to be signed and returned to school every Monday. Click HERE to see the Monthly Behavior Calendars for 2010-2011. I'll post the ones for 2011-2012 when I get around to making them! : )
All the time, everywhere.
the problem here is that I did not plan to slack on a long term basis. if I did, then I probably would have done something more long term while I was unemployed.. like taking up classes or seriously revamping my room. I didn’t, or couldn’t afford to take such a long hiatus from work, I needed to work both for my sanity as well as plumping up my wallet (or even changing one). so the daily routine was pretty much surfing the net and searching for jobs on the plentiful job portals out there. I really became bored as the number of days that added on to that routine increased.
Will shrugged and said nothing.
Have a Sunny day somehow today (:)
Most of all, I hope you hear me talking to you from across the years. I hope you find a little bit of me in you and of you in me. I hope you find something you could never hope to find elsewhere. I hope you find a legacy, a gift, from me to you.
Now that is a sobering statistic. I really don't understand killing your kids, at least not until they reach puberty.
The Harlem Ambassadors offer a unique brand of Harlem-style basketball, featuring high-flying slam dunks, dazzling ball-handling tricks and hilarious comedy routines. The Ambassadors feature non-stop laughs and deliver a positive message for kids wherever the Ambassadors play.
Now I am at my Daddy's house and I am having a sweet and meaningful visit. It is a very good thing. Just like with my brother, our time always involves driving around "looking at stuff". All of us in this clan visit in this same manner. Next post: out at the ranch.
1/2 cup half & half cream
I can't believe my 2 weeks holiday is nearly over...... only 2 days to go :(
5. “Under My Nails” (Puerto Rico, directed by Ari Maniel Cruz): No film proved as divisive and controversial during the 28th Chicago Latino Film Festival as Cruz’s psychosexual thriller about a woman who feels a rather sick attraction to the couple next door, an attraction that grows as soon as the Haitian wife disappears.
every single day of our lives.
(So I will assume paying for an urn is out of the question, right?)
The audio from the squad car contained the sound of a zipper and moans from Sgt Eiskant. At one point the officer could be heard saying “Oh show me those big beautiful breasts, baby.”
Unfortunately, even knowing that means little. The great writers of our day and days gone by are a woefully small minority of humankind. They do not grow on trees. They are not a dime a dozen. You can't find them as easily as, say, an artist (don't tell me you don't know that the greatest masters of the canvas can all be identified by how well they draw Tippy?!?).
Haroseth- is a mixture of chopped apples, nuts, cinnamon, and wine representing the mortar used by the Jews to build structures in Egypt during their slavery.
Lets get stoned, hang out at the lake and fuck our brains out for hours while listening to Led Zeppelin.
OPENING SOON:
So, no answers but at least I can run again – that is going to be hard! I’ll start again with a gentle run/walk programme and take it from there.
And when you allow the presence of Jesus to have absolute first place in your heart, I guarantee amazing things will happen in your life! That is because God is so creative He can lead you to life-changing thoughts, decisions, and actions. This will do far more than just resolve a particular situation; it will bring healing, freedom, and even deliverance.
One may try, but it will not be overwhelmed so easily.
He lives, and while he lives, I'll sing.
After resisting his sleazy advances for two years, Evelyn gave up and married him. She figured since she wasn't a virgin anymore, this was pretty much her only chance to bag a decent husband. Evelyn entered the union with no secrets, however, and told Harry how Stanford had deflowered her two years before. Needless to say, Harry was outraged.
Now, with that definition being above...I'll have to say...HELL NO I'M NOT. There was a time in my life where I had to ask help for everything. I couldn't take care of myself, wasn't doing well, and had to depend on others a lot. And admittedly I believe I felt like if you have it and I don't...help! And perhaps that was wrong, but I was young, so what do you expect??? Now as an adult, I admittedly cater to my own desires, because I DON'T have someone who is interested in what I want. I'm not in a relationship, my parents are deceased, my brothers are grown and have their own families...so, isn't that what I'm supposed to do? Make myself happy? I don't do it at the expense of others, so what's wrong with that???
the big toe
4 x Cadbury World drink mats,
printable worksheet for our son to complete at the end of the storybook this year so I created this printable where he can draw a line to connect the word/term with the matching definition. Because my son is not an artist, this printable was a way for him to participate without having to draw flowers over
let me go on...
Enjoy! - Erin
The question of our devotion, commitment and affection for any other person is significant. The answer to the question, “Do you love me?” is vital for every marriage, and actually, every friendship. But nowhere is that question more important than in evaluating one’s relationship with Christ. In fact, it could be said that the most important question that anyone will ever answer is if he loves Jesus Christ. I say that because to love someone (including Christ) means that we are committed to that individual with our will and affections regardless of the cost to ourselves. To love another means to serve him out of devotion to him.
Like in some over imaginative liberal's pre-civil rights fantasy, but with white targets, groups of people, calling themselves “concerned members of the Duke and Durham community”, but whom history will forever call “The pot-bangers”, and who's activities can be viewed on You tube here and here arrived outside the team captain's house. Singing songs of solidarity with the false accuser and banging a variety kitchen implements together. They demanded immediate confessions from the players, whilst simultaneously insisting they should be castrated and, presumably, raped, assuming I have correctly interpreted the words “Measure for Measure” emblazoned upon their banners.
Word Search
to accomodate the people from the Northern Kingdoms.
The difficult answer was "I don't know, but let's see if I can make a rough estimate"
An 87 page bilingual booklet that includes the missing scenes and dialogue from Goryeojang.
The local Republican establishment rationalizes that a young and underfunded Feinberg, if nominated, surely would lose in November and hand the 18th District seat to Democrats. But what do they think they have sitting in that seat now?
Ink for stamping and edges
One reason for veteran suicides (and crimes, which get far more attention) may be post-traumatic stress disorder, along with a related condition, traumatic brain injury. Ryan suffered a concussion in an explosion in Iraq, and Michael finally had traumatic brain injury diagnosed two months ago.
Her's my card:
While I do not have a garden of my own, I have access to the next best thing; neighbors who do have vegetable gardens -- some quite large -- who kindly share their bounty with me. It's a blessing which I do my best to return the favor, such as with small gifts -- such as my homemade cookies.
Strawberry-Lime Cream Cake
I've held off on posting the recipe and review for this one because I'm not all that happy with it. I was hoping it might improve with some time, but that doesn't seem to be the case. I had high hopes for this beer, having gone through some additional trouble to perform a multi-step temperature mash and a cereal mash for a pound of unmalted spelt. The results are not what I expected; a little disappointing.
I'm back to my normal shifts now and to be honest, I can't wait. I've loved taking Wee Z to nursery and Miss C to playgroup but it's so tiring. By the time 4pm comes I just want to go to bed, not work!
One of the most important things I learnt through the life coaching I went through is that there are other ways of being! Other ways of reacting and that being vulnerable and showing that vulnerability at the right time is, in fact, very powerful. After all, if nothing else, it gives the other person the chance to give, to show understanding, to love and protect.
Just as I’ve recently discovered how easy it is to cook with dried lentils, I also discovered how easy it is to make homemade hummus. I love hummus. A lot. I may even have a hummus addition. I love it with pita chips, sliced veggies, or on a sandwich. It’s lemony-garlicy goodness is a healthy and delicious snack or condiment.
She stood there and watched, Tripti went to Revati and rudely woke her up, “It’s nine in the morning!” she guffawed. “Look at you! Sleeping like a sloth. Soon you will become a bump in the bed.”
Don't you deserve to feel that way too? Don't you WANT to have that feeling of accomplishment that comes with having just poured your sweat, time and effort into making your body stronger, lean and powerful? Get out there! Make today your day to commit 30 mins to your body. You'll be glad you did. You'll be proud of yourself. You'll realize that it's not that hard and maybe you'll choose to do it tomorrow too!
this is so not going good……… I’ve GAINED the pound I lost – it’s not my official weigh-in but I thought I had better get back on the scales after and appalling couple of days and there it was….. almost 2lbs actually…… I’m almost 11st 4lb - I’m eating my Diet Chef… oh yes I am… AND I’M EATING EVERYTHING ELSE I CAN GET MY HANDS ON TOO!!! I even walked over to the shop late last night for a bar of Cadbury’s fruit and nut! This is so not good – if I continue like this I wont want to go to L.A.
5 Punchdrunks Drive A Dragster
Q & A with Derrick
The big news of the week is Los Angeles’ signing of Albert Pujols to the tune of $250 million for ten years. While most fans are left scratching their heads by the signing of a 31-year old Dominican who is likely older than he states and not as great as he once was, you knew that his first Angels card would be announced in the coming days.
Officer: What kind of irresponsible, horrible, unfit mother kicks their child out of the house because of something as ridiculous as his refusal to do jobs? You should be ashamed... I will be taking these children with me now...
It has been a few days since I wrote last and while a lot has happened (dinners and visits from new and old friends, nights on the outskirts of hell and things like that) but little that can be wrapped into a simple tale. As you know from my previous emails one of my favorite writers is Thoreau, not because of his insight or style, but because he was an amusingly truly strange dude (Remember he thought getting thrown in jail was…well..cool). He believed the minutia of life represent the archetypes for the big things in life and by paying close attention to those little things you will learn something about something. He once spent a better part of a week at Walden Pond observing and writing about two gangs of ants who had decided to fight over something in the dirt in front of the door to his cottage. Thoreau seemed to see in their tussle a metaphor and analogue of the larger conflicts between nations, people and within ones own spirit. I really couldn’t understand what he was talking about. If I were to choose a metaphor for life from his experiences I prefer the one I mentioned in an earlier email, Thoreau standing at the back of his boat traveling down the Connecticut River, spittle dripping off the end of his nose, passing under the bridge on which the spittee stands. Think about it. Put yourself in Henry David’s flip-flops. Do you, staring at the smirk on the face of your adversary, feel the spirit of unity and oneness with the universe well up inside you as Henry David claimed he did, or do you decide to head the boat into the bank, jump off and beat the SOB to within an inch of his life or continue on forever questioning the nature of your experience and of your response. Now, that’s life.
One thing is for sure: everyone is like that oak tree. The only difference is that we can replant ourselves regularly if we needed to. If that tree takes root in the forest, it will live its whole existence there while we can continue to move out into the open. We have a tremendous advantage, so why not dare using it? Move out into the open today and tomorrow will be too much rewarding.
The Tale of the Weaver Who Stole from Himself
I used the Everyday Faces peachy keen stamp for his face - I use these stamps all the time. They are my go-to stamps!
"Intimate with the base of the Cross is the Cor Sacrum. Attracted by which (in similar form, but insignificant in comparison) are the two smaller hearts of Faith and Hope.
You could endorse the letter the letter above or send a letter of solidarity addressed to Ethel Long Scott, Executive Director WEAP at weap@weap.org
OK, that's enough. If this wasn't my profession, I wouldn't be watching the show. The feel-goodiness of the show is too saccharine, but I'm going to keep watching for a few eps to see if this mellows and to see how they handle the portrayal of nurses as main characters.
I have never ever liked regulations really. So I’ve to come clean and admit it. I was completely wrong, and Google was appropriate almost all along. I attempted to beat them at Search engine marketing, I attempted to obtain to the top of the search rankings using each and every form of link developing tactic I could get my hands on. But I was wrong and I’ve learned my Lesson.
he is people’s greatest help.
It was so much more real than listening on YouTube or playing their CD’s at home, I had no idea how magical it would be. Nor did I have a clue until I arrived that I was sitting in the front row, right in front of Caroline’s microphone, an even happier treat as we are related but that is not why I write this. I write this because this trio’s tight harmonies are so stunning as to leave you breathless after every song. Just when you think, that’s it, that’ll be the best of the night right there… Wait. There is always more and it’s even more stirring, more soulful than the harmonies you just heard.
Here the text becomes a battleground for competing desires and pulsions, the ‘so many disparate parts’ of language that emanate from the ‘mouth’ compete as vehicles for the assertion and explosion of self. The humanist distinction between human and animal, and the rationalist distinction between subject and object collapse as zoologist and mole become one and the same. Darwin is conjured as the archetypal destroyer of epistemologies and metanarratives (as in his impact on Judaeo-Christian cosmology). In this respect Göransson is a Darwinistic regressor, a user of the name as a vehicle for becoming animal. Being is discarded in favour of movement. The body, both personal and political, becomes the site of conflict and abjection as in the titles of some of the poems in the collection:
I took some ID with me and walked into the yard, found the office and walked in.
Overall, it’s a show that demonstrates Thornton’s skill, his fast-but-bearable pace, and his lightning quick ability to make any situation work in his favour.
Sylvie
14 Love on the Rocks With No Ice
10. Pick Me, I'm Clean
Dinner at an Indian restaurant with a group of teaching friends was the plan. One last hurrah if you will. And having for the most part escaped the excruciating heart burn of my first pregnancy, a little gluttony was due.
The reason I pick this earlier day of the year as the first day of spring in New York is because in New York City St. Patrick’s Day is the day that you can expect the lengthening days to become equal with the shortening nights. In other latitudes it happens on other days, but in New York City you can mark St. Patrick’s Day on your calendar for this event.
4. Sinuses - Headache causing and infection heaven.
Now, here's the God's honest truth, I would rather the Life Force Sucker come out to me as a post-op transexual than have him come home sporting paes. This is the truth! Good God! Have mercy!
(a) Commonwealth Act No. 494, authorizing the President of the Philippines to suspend until the time of the adjournment of the next regular session of the National Assembly, either wholly or partially and under such conditions as he may deem proper, the operation of Commonwealth Act No. 444, commonly known as the Eight Hour Labor Law;
When I was 17 a shift happened. I don’t know exactly why it did, but I do know that as things got better in Leah and our dad’s relationship, things seemed to improve within our relationship. I’m not a psychologist but I believe that as she addressed old feelings of rejection from our dad, as well as her own insecurities as a child/teen, she was able to evaluate the driving force behind the cruelty she exhibited towards me. Leah began to make changes and apologized several times. I don’t know how many times, but I think she knew she would have to say it a lot. She was determined to make sure I knew how sincere she was each time she did so too.
She will be there whenever you need her.
Currently, Tim teaches writing at Morrisville State College, where he is also the director of the art gallery. He has been taking pictures regularly since he got his first Olympus OM-10 in 1981.
Prancin’ Filly, Chet Atkins
She's in the big city on a business trip as part of her inclusion in The Australia Five,
During my pregnancy with the Mouse, time spent on my feet teaching and chasing after two toddlers meant that my pelvis objected, loudly. So I looked forward to resuming my night-walking after her arrival, especially since she was a summer baby.
As with most doctors, treatment by a naturopath can range from one office visit to many. Some acute illnesses can be alleviated with one or two visits. Other chronic diseases need regular weekly or monthly attention. Clinical care provided by naturopathic physicians are covered by insurance in a number of states in the United States.
The Sun smoldered above him in a controlled fashion. It pulsed and swirled and at times resembled water more than flame. At the same time, this was not a flowing orb of magma. This was living flame held in place by some unseen globe of glass.
Like I said, he kicks off the rotation's third time around. And we'll see if as a group, they can keep stringing together nifty starts, like they have done in every game so far.
The fact is that we are already one. We are in Christ and He is in us. This makes us one (John 17:22, 23). How could we all be “in Christ” and not be one? The problem is not our oneness, the problem is the practical expression of that oneness. That comes through us walking it out together day by day. That comes through us developing a “body consciousness” as Watchman Nee called it. It comes through a revelation of the corporate nature of the Church. It comes through developing a lifestyle of community and not one of individualism and independence. And it comes by us sharing our lives with one another and taking care of one another. In a word, this is family, but family in the true sense of the word. Not family as we have seen it in this world, but family as a genuine expression of the community life of God.
Worship doesn’t look only forward to the day when we reach heaven and see God on the throne. Worship is seeing God in our midst, right here, right now.
Come to think of it, when I was kid, I was outside, wandering the front and back yard and next door parking lot. I don't remember spending a lot of time playing with my parents in elementary school. They were doing whatever parents do and it didn't make a good or bad impression on me. It just was. So I think we have some time yet to get it all in and I'm not going to sweat the small stuff. It will come when it needs to and will shape our family life however it can. They will grow up how they are supposed to.
2. Pack Up Your Sorrows
The rains will come
As a good writer, you already have the ability to write concise, interesting, and funny prose. That's all Twitter is. It should be a breeze for you to build a following of people that includes literary agents and book editors that can assist you in getting the word out about your work, or offer you a deal if you don't have one. Don't use this as a chance to hit them over the head with your book; just demonstrate what a good writer you are and they will want to read it on their own.
Four women I sit with – including my boss – bitch about anyone and everyone. They even bitch about each other when one is away which can be amusing to an observer.
A group of ANC youth league supporters of Julius Malema sang the song “Shoot all the White People” at the university of Witwatersrand on Friday-evening, 14 October 2011.
In The Problem of Pain, C.S. Lewis says, “God allows us to experience the low points of life in order to teach us lessons that we could learn in no other way.” I’ve been thinking a lot about these words and have started to wonder what lessons I can learn from sadness that I might not learn any other way. I see the following:
Miller Brewing Co. Miller Chill
My favourite versions of the stories were always the fantastical, romantic, plate-armoured ones - not just Excalibur but Malory, Tennyson, and the Pre-Raphaelites . I didn't think I could compete with those so I decided to do the other sort of King Arthur book - the kind that shows him not as a king at all but as some sort of war-leader in post-Roman Britain, which is what he really was if he ever existed at all. There have been loads of good books like that, too - Rosemary Sutcliff's The Lantern Bearers, for instance, or Mary Stewart's Arthur trilogy - but they all portray Arthur himself as a great leader. Rosemary Sutcliff, writing in the 1950s, naturally sees Arthur as a Churchillian figure who leads the Romano-British defenders against hordes of invaders sweeping over the North Sea. But I lived under Tony Blair, not Churchill, so I had a rather different view of leaders!
Join us to let Tony Ball know what we think of his ‘achievements’ at Dale Farm.
Complications from diabetes. Decompensated heart failure. Sudden cardiac death.
Unless you are paralysed, bedridden or a baby the urge to empty will make you move, stretch your legs, get up and go. Interrupt the flow(!), make you come to a standstill, regroup. Often for the better.
Astrid Swan‘s Hits (Pavement For Girls) was the first Soliti release (Soliti 001) last August (2011). We’ve rounded up all the tracks we’ve given away or streamed at the Soliti Soundcloud page into a post-able playlist. As well as Box Elder & Shady Lane from the album, find remixes of album tracks by Jori Hulkkonen, Burning Hearts & Serefe Sound System.
The dried sour cherries have been soaking in Cognac and Lyle's Syrup overnight. After I tasted them, I thought maybe I'd let them soak a little too long because the flavors you could taste were, in order, cognac, cognac, and cognac. Maybe a cherry-flavored cognac? They would be lovely on ice cream, or some flaming dessert, but I thought they might be a little much for an afternoon cake. I rinsed them and dried them.
Claire Squires was the first woman to die whilst taking part in the London Marathon which has taken place 32 times. They are still to confirm the reason for her death, however 7 of the total of 11 fatalities in the race were related to heart diseases, two suffered brain haemorrhages and one died due to drinking too much water (hyponatremia).
Jody Egginton, Caterham F1 Team Chief Engineer: “It’s been another solid day for us on the final day of the Mugello test. Heikki took over the car today and ran a program very similar to Vitaly’s from day two, completing 139 laps which helped us achieve everything we wanted from this test. We have tried a number of new parts including bodywork, floor, exhausts and some work on the brakes, some of which we expect to see on the race cars next week in Barcelona.
Lest it involve breast milk.
The topics of rounding and finding 1/4 of a number were taken off as they are not in Common Core Standards for grade 2.
I'm assuming I ain't gettin' the 590 this Christmas because none of the gifts are big enough (although one is big enough for shotgun shells...but it's not so fun without the shotgun. However, remember that Lone Ranger episode where he had bullets but no gun and he used some rocks to fire a bullet off and get the bad guy)?
This has very little to do with the many unique features of this administration. It is typical of any administration under siege, and it is as understandable and inevitable as it is unfortunate and even dangerous. I know it well, having seen it with my own eyes during the Iran-Contra siege of the Reagan White House 25 years ago, when the president’s men and women concentrated all their energies and all their passions on “saving” the president from what many of them believed was the return of Watergate. I don’t know if the Obama faithful have an historical template for the current crisis, but their behavior, like Obama’s, is altogether familiar. The White House is hermetically sealed to reality and the president simply repeats his mantras and tries to look unconcerned, even confident and feisty.
I'm doin' it. It's not for lack of material mind you... I just felt I needed to address this issue before people began asking me "soo... Chanel... why don't you ever talk about the herd of elephants in the room?".
MUST HAVE APPS:
Exhibit A, the Waffle Iron. This is actually a Belgian Waffle maker that Rachel and I have owned for 15 years. In fact, I’m pretty sure we got it as a wedding gift and have only used it a few times. Apparently, Belgian waffle irons are slightly different than regular American-style waffle makers because they make a thicker product, so you have to adjust your cooking time accordingly.
Who would have the chutzpah to take on a Rothschild ‘chateau’ in Berkshire? Why an Ephrussi of course! Or a potter. Edmund de Waal is still a potter although many now know him as a writer and, oh the romance, a descendent of an outrageously exciting family of bankers and art collectors who competed with the Rothschilds and knew everyone who was anyone. Now he has quietly infiltrated the very inner sanctum of the competition and sneaked his own work in among their fabulous collections.
In conclusion to this post I think my mother was right, when we’re living with a person we have to accept them for all of their habits, we may not particularly enjoy them, but that makes it part and parcel of who and what we are. And men… if a lady plays a prank back on you, accept it and have a giggle about it, because after all she is just like you: human.
come up with a recipe that’s so delicious, with such a beautiful flavor and
“It's not us, it's the referee.” protested the moustached man.
Coming back into my room I find @marktharparms and @richardmackney tweeting about a meteor shower. I did GCSE astrology back at school (never took the exam but glad I took it up as a hobby) and so could find a couple of constelations, and was surprised when I looked out about midnight to find a perfectly clear sky. We're in Wales after all, perfectly clear skies happen as often as a meteor shower...
Disney may call itself the happiest place on earth but they've got nothin' on Tiffany's!!
How can you do something that hasn’t been done?
I took a photo on which this painting is based on a free walk organised by a lovely volunteer organisation in my town. The monument in the distance is Stoodley Pike – a landmark around here in Calderdale. In this painting, I was obviously going for the effect of the wind gently creating waves with the moors’ grasses.
Wow. Almost 500 negative words right there. That doesn’t sound very fragmented, that sounds incessant… unrelenting.
President Castro, who wore a straw hat against the sun, waved and smiled at the marchers but did not speak, leaving that to Communist Party official and labor leader Salvador Valdes Mesa.
Scott Horton
This will be my first NEGATIVE audio book for this year. I thought the story was fun and I think it would've played out wonderfully in print form, however the narrator's lack of inflection drove me bonkers and made me want to throw the CDs out the window! I found it extremely frustrating that she portrayed the main character with so little gumption and everything she said was flat and with no emotion. Normally I love southern accents but after listening to 12 discs of that monotone drawl, I was ready to have myself a few drinks!
Fleece for stuffing
A1b Do You Know Where '2' Is?
This is not a color combination I would usually choose, but I was pulling them all from this fabulous DP by My Minds Eye called Sunshine. What do you think?
I have all my ingredients. I have a good block of time. In addition this was my first time trying to brew after work on a weekday. So the homebrew stores are closed plus to make a new manifold would take some time. That's when I remembered I had a paintstraining bag, so I tried a modified brew in a bag method. It worked out, but was difficult because I was already maxing my Mash Tun with 15lbs of grain. My efficiency was a bit low, so I added a bit of table sugar to get my O.G. up higher.
Which of the following have you ever done at the same time?
God is always there and hear my cries.
Recommendation: Not to many of my personal bias buttons pressed, so I can recommend it again. Just barely, admittedly.
One life-history trait is the age of first reproduction (AFR). Because AFR is highly heritable, there may have been co-evolution between biology and culture. In other words, natural selection has tended to bring full reproductive maturity into line with the age when young couples have enough resources to marry and start a family.
making creative rhymes./
(Note to self - Do not attempt photoshop tutorial on a Monday night.
May you always be courageous
Mix both the reserved water and the extract in a vessel. Add salt and jagree and heat again till it is foamy. Remove and temper in hot ghee with mustard seeds,curry leaves and cumin seeds and the peeled garlic cloves. Wait till garlic turns brown and then add to rasam.
On my way to the shop my back was aching, it's where my stress instantly goes. I was wondering how to react should I look distressed be apologetic, sad maybe drum up some tears. I was in misery! Karen sent me a note to read from our friend who's bunny I was delivering, it's not long but I started to read it but couldn't finish before I left the seen of the crime because It made me want to start baling just the few words I read. It wasn't until I was leaving the shop in Spearfish that I finished.
But here’s Josep Anglada, without masks or disguises, ready to continue to defend the sublime concept of Catalan and Spanish identity, with the enormous responsibility of knowing that he not only represents the people of his party, but also many Catalans who, out of fear, still make worthless decisions when voting.
There was a time in my life when I never wanted to share my "testimony" because of all that I have done wrong and all the wrong that has been done to me. I think that it is one area where God has really been changing me. To go from a fear of what others may think to a fear (healthy fear) of what my Lord may think. 1990 was a census year, I was 17(soon to be 18)years old and had my first baby on this day (3/23). I have been trying to look back and see God in my life during that time. It is hard but I know that He was there.
1 ounce of Vanguard (5.0%) for 45 minutes
-Daniel Bryan chant.
Roundup: 5 books read, 1 abandoned. Click the titles below for my full reviews or reading notes (some links will take you off this site). My rating scale is explained here.
Finally, on Mother's day in 2008 right after I graduated & moved home from college my mom gave in.
This past weekend as I stood in our kitchen preoccupied with my own thoughts, the silhouette of our birch suddenly caught my eye, as it stood illuminated by the setting sun, against an evening sky defined by peach and iris blue coloured hue. The day has aged into twilight, my favorite kind of light. I love the time of dusk, with its contagious stillness and enchanted atmosphere.
I went with Jamil Zainasheff's recipe from Brewing Classic Styles. Having never made a Flanders Red before I figured I would start with his recipe and make adjustments down the road.
- Greenore 8 year old Single Grain
Dinner is another delight as I eat an amazing Crunchy Tuna Roll which totally rivals Bentos Crunch Roll. Britt and I split a Milk Tart for dessert (a South African specialty!). Their (everyone but me) plan was to go out after dinner, back to Long Street. I knew I was too tired because we had to wake up at 7:30 for our second Township visit and by the time we completed our long dinner, Brittany knew she was too. We hurry back to the ship to go to sleep, as the rain gently pours outside (a sign we made the right decision!)
AdriN2001: I love you too
Kirstie and Maks
The success of Avatar, plus your piggy viral, plus your Producer's vague comments (not necessarily an alien movie); it all adds up. Romantic Violent Sci Fi. Brilliant man, fucking brilliant. A new genre!
(source: zeenews.india.com)
Ms Halpern has now taken down her post, and the equally cringe-worthy 'poor little me' ones that followed. But you can read the original review here and the responses were all about how the author had poured her heart and sould and time into her work, while the blogger had just dashed off a piece of snark, and the author was in a higher place than the reviewer and no one should write negative reviews at all, because it might but readers off, and authors have feeling too, and google should create a negative review filter (I think she was employing hyperbole at some points, but the general hysterical nature of the thing made it hard to tell).
The question of the day, however, was student housing. It’s no great secret that student housing in Glasgow is fraught with problems. One story recounted at the hustings was about someone’s kitchen ceiling falling in and the landlord taking no action to fix it in over six months. All of the candidates agreed that enforcement was the major problem, with existing legislation underutilised or not enforced to an appropriate degree. The SNP candidate was the most vocal in blaming Labour, who took fire from everyone. The candidate for the Greens, interestingly, took up the question with students who’d asked it, and arranged meetings with them after the hustings.
We feel a shrinking inside
Queen Califia's Magical Circle Sculpture Garden, Escondido
Yet he didn’t get that.
Happy International Women’s Day!
But one was: You write a daily blog. Is it difficult to keep coming up with stuff each day?
Then there are a whole slew of "Love Boat"-worthy passengers on the Cyclops' maiden voyage, including Claude (Richard Mulligan) and his wife Sybil (Sally Kellerman) who want to get a divorce but still manage to get themselves into many wanton trysts together; Father Kudos (Rene Auberjonois), a priest who spends most of his time questioning God and why he ever took Holy Orders to begin with; Dr. Kurtz (Bob Dishy) a veterinarian who has a dark secret; Emery Bush (Richard B. Shull), a man with only a few months to live; Camille Levy (Lynn Redgrave), a mysterious woman who has a bone to pick with Dan.
Well, I hope you are doing the 5 Day Challenge (The Husband Project) with me. I also, subscribe to i-MOM's Espresso Minute (daily e-mail) and I found some things that go right along with Kathi's Husband Project. Check them out...
In a large bowl, on medium speed of an electric mixer, beat the butter until creamy, about 3 minutes. Add the milk carefully and bet until smooth. Add the melted chocolate and beat well, about 2 minutes. Add the vanilla and beat for 3 more minutes. Gradually add the powdered sugar and beat on low speed until creamy and desired consistency.
Kyla Schmidt
When you accept sodomy in the army, you will see it spreading like wild fire. The boys are far from home, and muscle men can enslave each other while the Military police can only stand and watch.
The Star
Well, big wheels roll through fields where sunlight streams
Now for the hard part; I can transfer all my followers from Twain Wannabe to my author blog. Problem is, half of you joined for self-publishing tips, half to sign up for giveaways, and half because you are friends or family (ok - my math may be a little off). But I can't just move half of you; it is all or nothing. So off you go. I apologize in advance if you prefer to remain a member of Twain Wannabe. But honestly, my author blog is, well...prettier. I plan to make the move by the end of the weekend.
FROM UNRULY SCHOOLBOY TO COUTURE COBBLER: LOUBOUTIN’S STELLAR RISE TO FAME
So a loss to last season’s Auburn team combined with a loss to this year’s LSU team disqualifies them from consideration. And that’s different from Alabama’s resume exactly how?
I got in 20 minutes of cardio earlier, as well as 20 minutes of my devotional book, plus I'm still working on decluttering my house. Two big bags of stuff got taken to the Collin Cty Children's Advocacy Center's drop off today, and I have lots more to go!
I had some errands to do, so a few minutes later I stepped outside and looked up at the sky, this morning a mottled vista of gray-white clouds and large patches of baby blue. A breeze blew gently as I walked around my truck to get in the driver’s seat. And I couldn’t help but be struck . . .
the valleys not the peaks to make choices,
Ghajini effect can be majorly observed during the college times, exams especially. There have been so many times that there was an answer I knew word to word before I entered the hall. In such cases, either that one question doesn’t come in the question paper (I write the answer anyways though), or else it comes, and I’m blank, and the worst part, you would be surrounded by people who either haven’t learnt that chapter, skipped that question or else are suffering from the Ghajini Effect too.
As guests arrived, they were encouraged to grab a bowl and concoct their personal blend of dumpling filling. After a slow start, the cabbage started spilling, there was black vinegar everywhere, and a potsticker pan and new 8" steamer were in full rotation. There were vegetable dumplings, there were pork and shrimp dumplings. There was shrimp and cilantro. There were a few little salads of straight filling ingredients (I provided no appetizers). Due to the time-consuming nature of handmade wrappers, I had provided a pile of store-bought ones as well, but my homemade ones were better in every way, easier to fill, tastier, and prettier. I wound up making another batch of dough halfway through because I wasn't enjoying filling and cooking the store-bought wrappers. I think they're better for ravioli, actually.
brigade manner, the Nigerian
Bill was bleeding from the bugle, he had cuts above both eyes
6:00 PM THOMAS
Loved how it turned out :) Give this challenge a try - the deadline is this Sunday!
Communications and Public Information Under-Secretary-General of the United Nations, Kiyo Akasaka, has urged advertising companies to "defy" damaging and negative stereotypes of women to counter the violence, low self-esteem and abuse that poor standards and exploitation in advertising cause.
Third, there's the artistic language of cinematography and editing that's been in development for the past 115 years. A low-angle shot of a character indicates power, a high-angle shot indicates worthlessness. A roving, bobbing camera probably puts us in a character's POV (an assumption that Friday the 13th exploited to create suspense). Cutting between two shots creates an association between them, chronologically or thematically or emotionally.
Scottish Labour’s parliamentary business manager Paul Martin said: “Given the sensitivities around senior politicians’ dealings with media executives in light of the phone-hacking scandal, I find it astonishing that the first minister failed to disclose a meeting with the man at the very heart of this scandal.
the loves it loved.
That he had
That's when everyone's shoes came off, and things kicked into high gear with the barefoot jammin'--the President himself reportedly danced for three full hours. Among other dances, guests did the Electric Slide, which impressed Chris Rock so much he tweeted about it:
15 min-Nugget 2#
1. Combine all of the ingredients in a large heatproof mixing bowl, preferably stainless steel because the mixture will heat faster than in glass. Set the bowl directly in a wide skillet of barely simmering water (if your bowl bobs in the water, simply pour some out). Stir the mixture with a silicone spatula, scraping the bottom to prevent burning, until the mixture is very hot to the touch and the egg whites have thickened slightly and turned from translucent to opaque, 5 to 7 minutes. Set the batter aside for 30 minutes to let the coconut absorb more of the goop.
The unsuspecting Art waddles along the rugged trail until
This image captures the moment just after Watson loses his right foot and before his crew mates managed to hoist him into the boat. The engraving is a copy of the 1778 oil painting by American artist John Singleton Copley. Almost 30 years after the attack, Watson, then a successful businessman, commissioned the well-known portraitist to depict the event. Immortalised in paint, Watson and the Shark caused a sensation when it was exhibited at London’s Royal Academy in the same year. A London newspaper provided a detailed description of the attack, though it is believed that Watson wrote it himself. It is dramatic and stirring in its tone concluding, ‘after suffering an amputation of the limb…the youth received a perfect cure in about three months.’
The exhibit proved beyond any doubt, the iPhone and its rivals are a viable instrument with which to capture an image and turn it into a serious work of art. Though the photographer still faces hurdles as to a certain technical limitations itself, especially that by software developers, we most not lose sight, iPhoneography and smartphone cameras are here to stay.
We were SO excited for our engagement session with Dana Grant. I've known Dana for a couple years now and she is one of the most talented photographers that I've ever seen/worked with. She did our family pictures a few years ago, and then I also had her take my graduation pictures. I love her and she's SOO easy to work with. I can't wait for her to shoot our wedding!
Peter Schmit (changed his name from Schmidt to Smith in fit in with American culture)
My sister - "Yes, what do you need?"
Are you going to make purple products and prevent DV?
This fear tastes like a rusty knife
I must admit, my memory is terrible. I’ve never remembered things very well. Names especially are the worse. I don’t think it’s my age, because even at the university, when I was young, I had to learn all the names of the insects and parts of their bodies, or chemicals names, formulas, you know, lots of “name stuff”! It was terrible because memorizing has never been my strength. I never did good in those tests. Oh my… I’m so glad they are over.
Tracks 5 – 9 :
1- 3 Piece Filter Kit Includes: UV, Circular Polarizer and Flourescent Filter
“Abby! Abby, wait–what’s goin’ on now?”
Before I say anything else, I first want to say thank you so much for your thoughtful and encouraging
Last stop on the fish train: Con Dao island. If anybody here watched the most recent season of French Survivor, called Koh-Lanta, it took place in Con Dao. I'm not here to tell you about that time we had to eat spiders and centipedes because we were stranded in the middle of the jungle, though. I'll keep that for another time--or maybe you'll never hear about it again.
05. Money
We can choose to be on God’s side but we can also act against him and to do so isn’t without consequence. May we be like Joshua and know when to stay in the tent of meeting like he did in Moses time as he was getting to know the Lord closely, and also know when to fall face down in reverence… you could also say in fear of God.
"I pin them on boards. Why would I do that?"
With tour guides and tourists from around the world.
If you are in a holiday frame of mind here are some Easter ideas that I love...
On CBS’ Sunday Morning, March 25, 2012, I heard the comment that mothers in China try to buy American made food products for their children because Chinese made food products sometimes contain poisons. Here’s a link to CBS’ Sunday Morning, but I’ll be damned if I can find that statement. Did CBS whitewash it so they don’t get China mad?
Today I began the arduous task of cleaning my craft room. I really really wanted to do a card, but I knew I must clean, as I had no space to work ! Some of you probably know that feeling, lol.
CHI MACHINE BENEFITS
The most asked question we get at The Independent Publishing Magazine is often along the lines of; 'What self-publishing service should I go with?'; 'Is so and so a good service to go with?'; or 'Is so and so a scam?'
So with that in mind, I am embarking on my own challenge: 30 art journaling pages in 30 days.
A block away from the park, the moment it comes into sight, the seven year old (we shall call her Allison) stops in her tracks and declares her undying hatred for this park. I tell her that we’ll play here for fifteen minutes and move to another one, but we’ve been walking for a while, so it would be nice to let her sister out of the stroller to play for a little while. Allison begins to sob with huge, gasping breaths. Her face takes on a petrified expression and she glowers at me with her huge brown eyes like I’ve suggested she play blindfolded in the middle of a highway. And her eyes stay dry.
On May 11, the officers allegedly gained access to the home of Steven Goniwe by kicking the door open. Goniwe was allegedly taken from his house and forced into a police van before being driven to the police station.
…stared at my kindergartener’s hand with the pencil in it believing that i could telepathically make it move to finish his homework
I wanted to show you a close shot of the sentiment and you can also see the edges of my airbrushing and how my grey shadows blend really nicely into that airbrushing. You might have to click on the photo to get in really close to see.
The 2012 Winter Music Conference takes place March 16-25 at the Beachplex in Miami, Fl and the IDMAs go down on the 22nd. More info on WMC HERE >
11 years, an eternity some days, but a split second on others.
For me the moral of the story seemed simple. Discipline and determination would only get me so far. To be the best writer I could be required a sense of fun and an eager anticipation of each day’s work as an ongoing part of the equation as well.
"I wrote to Mr. Black and Mr. McScribe about my planned experiment to settle the Atlantis question," Aloysius went on, "and they very graciously consented to act as subjects. The fact that they are on opposite sides in that debate will give added significance to our findings."
Stay with my blog and follow all the other projects I create
Last week turned out to be way more expensive than I planned though most of my money went on this food stuff that I’ve heard so much about. A £45 shop at M&S would have cost me about £100 had I paid full price so I consider that money well spend, including these pretty awesome vegetable kebabs with halloumi cheese. Whilst we could make our own for cheaper (and will), it was at least a nice imagination starter. And both Thursday and Friday saw breaks in the rain in the afternoon so I was able to get in some decent walking. 12 miles on Friday!
I am thankful for her keen sense of observation, for her gentle spirit and her willing heart.
Well, to a young guy just starting the adventure of his life, this is a very scary inaccurate statement, but important information for someone later in life.
Also be sure to watch north .. up near Michigan going east toward Toronto Canada.
“I was not! It’s just, he’s nice. He’s married, anyway. His wife sounds interesting.”
Stampalicious Dessert Menu
Carano is not an actress and many of her line readings convey that amateur status but she more than makes up for that in brute physical force and she’s certainly no worse than other low-budget action stars such as Steven Seagal, Jean Claude Van Damme, and Chuck Norris. The film’s plotting makes itself out to be more intricate that it really is with an unnecessary framing device dragging things down for much of the first half of the film. However, one can’t say it is really a delight in watching Carano kick, punch, and ground and pound her opponents into submission and the film rises above its flaws to provide a somewhat out there, but ultimately pleasurable action experience.
God seemed okay with that.
I’m willing to go under the change
U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. Oral Health in America : A Report of the Surgeon General—Executive Summary. Rockville, MD. 2000, p.2.
METHOD: BLEND ALL INGREDIENTS TOGETHER IN VITA PREP AND PLACE INTO SIS
You’ll never know the depths of me,
Words in a French Life ~ by Kristin Espinasse (France)
I was listening on iTunes to the Flylady Pamper show from 7/28/2011 and they said their regular weekly show will be back on starting 8/18/2011!!! I'm so excited. I've missed her show so much!!! I really do need it to keep my motivation going.
It has just been a pretty awful day. I can't seem to sleep without my husband.
They hung their homes with evergreen;
"Coming so soon after Cabinet's decision to approve the draft Constitution 17th Amendment Bill, which empowers national government to usurp powers from local government, these are worrying developments."
There were other things I ate that were out of my norm.
There were no reports of serious adverse events, which translates to an estimated risk of, at worst, one per 10,000 treatments.
- Challenge ends Midnight the 25th!
Focus: Albania will soon celebrate 100 years since its independence. Is the idea for Great Albania still alive?
In a tilt at some bigger windmills Jobs pitched heavy-duty changes in the US education system – based on iPads of course – to Obama. Only Jobs had enough personal kudos to take this on; new CEO Tim Cook will wisely leave this alone. As for the breakup of monocausal/departmentalized diagnoses and treatments in the health sector, we may just have to wait until the New Jerusalem.
Even without the 2012 nose rules, it looks like FIF1 were going to follow a new direction in their nose design. Recent cars sported a narrow high nose, with a bump beneath it to create some downforce from the neutral centre section of wing. The team also tested a McLaren style under-nose snowplough in 2011, but weren’t able to get it to work for them. So they have opted for quite a wide and rounded nose section, the tip being formed into hammerhead shape by the two FOM cameras.
Advance policy about the VLE didn’t work in their favour. Mdx takes an inductive approach to policy making.
Marinade
Here are some of the towns and cities that have seen the most homes hit the market so far this spring.
That’s when the wheels came off. Due to a complicated set of circumstances that I won’t explain here, the kids and I were initially refused entry to the UK. We were allowed to see N for 24 hours and we had to go back to the US. It took me three weeks to sort things out and get back here.
Holeman said Zinkhan had his son and daughter with him when he went to the theater, but left them in the Jeep when the shooting occurred.
Orange +250
November 18, 2004 my dad died suddenly in his sleep. 11 months later, in the end of October my mom married a man she barely knew. But before they got married, he convinced us to come back to the house I grew up in and throw away/give away / sell everything. Every momento of my dads, everything he owned and loved. Every physical memory. We sold and gave away it all. I have about 10 or so pictures of him, and recently was given one other decorative thing that he had owned. but that is all. As I grew older this bothered me more and more. Then I had a baby and I was heartbroken that I had nothing to share with him of his grandfathers (papa, as my dad wanted to be called). My baby will never play with some of my old toys while I explain that my dad and I used to play with them together. I can’t play my dad’s favorite board games with my family… all of that is lost to me forever. Sure, I can buy replicas of the things, or different versions of the board games (and I have been!) but it is different. Those things were not his. I have nothing that was his (except the thing that I got about a month ago…).
Related articles
Luckily, we did not have to spend much time in our room. We walked around the town a lot, taking pictures. enjoying the atmosphere, learning about the history of the place, doing some shopping, having coffee, and so on. It was a good break!
222 SE 8th Ave, Portland, OR 97214
I found a lot I hated to spend more than $50 on (which were all over $250)...
Of note, the elderly caretaker is played by the late Ossie Davis, who, for some odd reason, you can imagine him hanging out in an old run down theater…Creepy.
"So they've twisted it so that I am the villain here! Your dad couldn't possibly have made a mistake! Oh, this makes me SO MAD!"
05. Say You Love Me Or Say Goodnight
That verse has been recited more times than any other in our house. By far. And it helps adjust our attitudes.
SIDOTI: "Do you fault the administration for not catching him though? I mean, they've had quite a few years going after him."
Then there was name and race selection and getting everybody to choose New Halas as their starting town.
The other day, as I was planning to start my March BJP piece, I pulled the DVD out again and reviewed it. I love Lyric's clear and easy manner of speaking. Its like having her sitting with you in your family room. The DVD has great visuals and its easy to see what Lyric is talking about as she demonstrates it with great close-up shots of her work as she repeats the stitches to make sure that you really understand.
Circle sentiment - Crafts Work Cards.
The Tapena Tempranillo, a blend of 90% Tempranillo and 10% Garnacha, was also tasty, showing more plum and black cherry flavors with milder spice notes but a bit more earthiness. Its tannins were a bit stronger than the Garnacha but still well within control. It too possessed more character than many other wines at this price point and also presents a very good value. I would generally prefer this wine paired with food due to its tannins.
All you need is some fabric, beads, and matching thread. The piece of fabric I started with was "58 x 46" (it was the end of a bolt) and I used 42 beads. Probably a package of 40 to 50 should work out perfectly or whatever you have in your stash.
1 cup + 2 tablespoons dark brown sugar, packed
Pastor Gerald Bastin
Silly order – ooh, that enormous jar of maraschino cherries is irresistible. I have to buy it...I’m sure I’ll find a recipe to use it somehow.
All in all Creature was enjoyable and not a complete disappointment and better than most creature features (fuck you Sci-Fi channel).
Attachment to the idea of what a love relationship should be like is probably why they so often fail. What should always be the goal of both persons is to keep the connection. Allowing a person to his own mistakes, giving them the freedom to come and go and trusting your ability to deal with it if they choose the later is the most important aspects of non attachment you can practice. Meanwhile keeping a healthy dose of the same connection to your own soul so that you know when behaviour is at the extreme and unhealthy end of the spectrum. You can love a person and not want to live with their destructive behaviour. You can love a person and not want them as part of your life. This is perfectly fine and in fact, vital.
Who? Bastille—London-based band with Dan Smith as a frontman
*“Have you ever had that supposedly common dream of being in a crowded place in only your underwear?”* she read. “I feel like that now.”
Sunday: Off.
it may not seem like a big price right now
Preheat your oven to 400.
If elections are not called by June, then it is unlikely to take place until next year. Fasting starts at the end of July, with Hari Raya falling in the third week of August while the Haj season begins in September and ends in November.
There are two problems with Searle’s analogy. First, in the case of the wood molecule and the table, they share the same property in the first place: the lattice-like structure of the wood molecule, like a folded piece of paper, just is solid (can bear weight by virtue of its structure). So solidity is not an “emergent macro-property,” solidity is already a property of the “micro” ingredients. If the question is “How can physical objects support weight?” then appeal to the weight-bearing nature of the wood molecule only pushes this question back a step. This problem with the analogy is irremediable: if the argument is that brains are conscious because neurons are conscious we have once again committed the hard-to-avoid error of including something mental in our purported recipe for the mental. If not, then the analogy does not go through: the wood molecules and the table share a property in common, so we do not have an actual example of a macro-property emerging from a micro-property (that is not to say that we couldn’t find such an example, only that this one isn’t it).
I could, but that's not the most important thing to say.
the Nigerian units in the operations
Moving butterfly clips became really popular. I would make my maid Janelle buy butterfly clips from the store near our house. I couldn’t go out of the house because I was still a kid, and I wasn’t allowed. The butterfly clips are made of some steel material, and it has springs so the wings of the butterfly move on its own. When you pin it on your hair, you look like you have a live butterfly sitting on your head. My classmates loved them and I loved them. My classmates would even wear more than one butterfly at a time. I also had butterfly rings, but they weren’t as popular as the clips. I would pick the prettiest clips that Janelle bought and sell the ugly ones. Sometimes I worried that nobody would buy the clips because they were ugly, but people still bought them. I guess everyone was so obsessed with this fashion trend that it didn’t matter if the clips were ugly, all that mattered was that they had a butterfly clip. Or maybe some people actually thought those ugly clips were pretty.
You get free baby formula in the mail. For months and months and months.
In our house, we have renamed them Falafel burgers because the taste and consistency is very close to that of a falafel. This will be a recipe we will come back to often because it is easy and cheap (much cheaper than buying ground beef or another meat protein)!
This however, was not the only announcement of the day. In what can now be seen as a complete rebirth of motorsport activities for the legendary brand, Lotus has also confirmed the development of both GT2 and GT3 variations of its mid-engined GT4 Evora.
When we come back, Kazarian and Daniels approach Kurt Angle. They said that Kurt never thanked them for helping them beat AJ Styles last week. Kurt takes an exception to that, and issues them a warning, do not ever come out and try to help him again in any of his matches.
This boom-era Brazilian pizza makes me glum. A certain swagger is needed to bake and flog flat, round bread for that price — the very swagger gone from the West. We are living the great global inversion. The price tag screams: You’re history, baby!
Dictator: Dictator has seen a purple dog.
Album drops Novemeber 8th.
Sand Mothers are exceptionally powerful and cunning versions of sand brides. The exact relationship between the two is unknown but Sand Mothers are far more dangerous. They choose the sites of their false oasis very carefully and usually know the location of several pitfalls or hazards that are concealed by the illusion. They're also better at concealing their intentions and wait until their victims are most vulnerable to attack.
It makes me think I should let them loose a bit more often.
The stay was extended another two weeks.
Torrent is also an excellent place for brands to present their future releases. This year, Pedro Fernández has presented his personal line of miniatures in this new adventure he called "Origen Art". The first minis from this new company are still not available, there were only a few limited edition copies for some fortunate few who could attend Torrent, but soon they will open their store online. Here you can get a few images from this new range:
Every creature was stirring, behind the closed door.
Right next to the fancy KL International Airport is the Low Cost Terminal. low cost is an understatement. it's the home of air Asia an it provides what can only be describe as a crappy, first and last impression for visitors. it's budget all the way.
We also came to realise that while we thought we were good drivers we were not all that good and one should not speed with a poorly maintained vehicle. The outside appearance and available power is worthless, even dangerous, if the driver cannot handle the car and is not experienced in high-speed driving. This is the case with South Africa.
I have used the Holly Berry Bouquet papers to to make both cards .
There are few people better equipped to reveal that past than Brian Merlis, owner of what is believed to be the largest private collection of Brooklyn photos and ephemera in the country. He has published 22 books about the neighborhoods of Brooklyn, all of them filled with rarely seen historic photos.
Here is the most exciting news for me. I will soon be contributing twice monthly articles to an online magazine in a section devoted to promoting the area I live in. Since I will be living in Newfoundland I will write about all I do, the people I meet and the places I visit. I will include photos and can even include videos and paintings and poetry. This is a nice paying position that will enable to me to write and work at home on all my other projects! With both kids going to school in the fall full time I shall devote all my energy to writing and books of all sorts shall soon be published.
Apparently it still does in some industries.
I think of her as a pivotal figure. More than almost anyone going today in the variety arts world, she has one foot firmly planted in what came before. I dont mean old time circus and vaudeville (while that’s also true). I mean what came JUST before — deconstructionist performance art. While completely entertaining in a traditional way, her work — her very existence — embodies thought-provoking ideas. If she didn’t exist, someone would have had to invent her. At the same time, she’s hysterically funny. She’s very big on Catskills, Borscht Belt type humor. The mix of her two sides, show biz plus radical politics reminds me of a lot of the performers who came along two decades before her, all those hippie new vaudevillians and street theatre people. She even talks like them.
Now every once in awhile, this obsession of hers actual makes my life easier. For instance, we are currently studying Colonial America and she found this series of books in the library, the America the Beautiful state books. They are not actually 'colonial' books, but the first half of each book gives the history of that state complete with the natives peoples, early settlers and all sorts of other cool and interesting details. We checked the Pennsylvania and New Jersey out of the library because I wanted her to to get the feel for the colonies other than Virginia and Massachusetts; colonies on which we'd already spent a lot of time. She likes them so much, she now wants to read all thirteen books from the states that were the original colonies. I told her she could skip the ones that we'd already covered, but she wants to read ALL of them. She is even talking about reading all fifty of them as she learns about them entering into the union. I had thought she'd balk at having to read so many similar books, but I wasn't counting on her need to complete a set. Having started, she is diligently working her way through the collection. It's always good to be reminded that even negative personality traits can have their plus sides.
I know I know, lame blog update. But the months are really starting to mush together in my head. Maybe I'm getting old. ;-)
Super work everyone and well deserved, please mail me brenda@ibas.co.uk with your full postal addys so I can get your prizes off to you and of course you can grab our Top 3 logo.
Many thanks to Kirsty for accompanying me into the interview and for asking some truly insightful questions, as well as typing up the massive chat transcript! And many many thanks to the Midlands MCM Expo Press Office for giving us the opportunity to ask those questions in the first place! I'll be running into Tommy and Sandy again later on this week, when SARAH-JANE.tv will be jetting off on a trip to Los Angeles for Gallifrey One!
Jen: Hi friend.
We are big fans of Damien Rice, Travis, Radiohead, Sigur Rós, and Coldplay. We got so many influences from them. Yet for the new album, we got a lot of influences from Coldplay, especially their album Viva La Vida. That particular album features a lot of strings in the sound, which also inspires us to feature string in the songs in our new album. We also got the influence from Jónsi and Sigur Rós.
Nick Rowe (founder of the not-for-profit organisation Reels on Wheels) and Jim Williams, best friend and staunch supporter of the above, will be fishing the competition. Nick (61 this year!), is a wheelchair user, suffering with osteo-arthritis throughout his joints, and a crumbling spine who doesn’t recognise the word “can’t”. Jim (who will be 51 soon), suffers from acute organo-phosphate poisoning, which exhausts him and necessitates him taking oxygen with him on long trips.
"I pointed out some different things, and right away I got some really positive feedback from feminists of color who read my blog. But then I also got really, really, really challenged all over the place by the liberal white feminist bloggers who came over to my site," said Susana. "It was a constant, I'm not going to believe you until you prove it to me. Prove that Afghani women are aware that the burqa is viewed as misogynist and oppressive.'"
The photos you are looking at were shot by Jon Jackson in 1982 during a show The Beat played in Nottingham, U.K. Jon’s son, who is a Redditor, posted a short back story about his Father and the genesis of the photos:
Money Matters is funded through the Big Lottery Reaching Communities programme until June 2014. Our aim is to establish Money Support Groups in and around Doncaster Borough bringing money saving tips to the sessions and much more. We deliver a free confidential one to one money / debt advice service which again can be accessed across Doncaster. This one to one advice can also be given over the telephone.
Okay, so I haven't exactly been sitting on my fingers this last month. In fact I arranged and performed a song, wrote a couple short stories, edited for a two critique partners, and worked on this:
Creative learning moments occur when we have time to take the “scenic route” and stop if something interesting comes up. I find that creativity requires some structure! In my experiences of teaching and in motherhood, I have found that when we schedule and organize our routine, the children feel secure, and yet I must stay flexible and open to the joy of the spontaneous!
Batman: Gotham Noir
Ok yoochun twitter has been resting on my mind lately his pictures are amazing but somehow I sense sadness abd love within them I know he has hardships but he is working too hard I guess to keep his mind from collapsing.
98. Lord of the Flies, The: William Golding
Owen & Engine is tapping a cask of this at 5 tonight.
But Unwin does not favour the central square of the town also being where the station is located.
And I’ll gamble away my time.
By Amanda Bland
When I sneeze, you say bless you,
This blog entry is dedicated to the memory of my dear friend and Food Empowerment Project supporter Marti Kheel, who passed away late last year. Marti and I were both passionate about the importance of the interconnections between the issues of animal exploitation and the rights of women and workers, especially knowing that their combination truly made history.
I used the white ribbon to add a little interest and cover up the rough edges. It is from the Tim Holtz Idea-ology Collection http://store.scrapbook.com/ch-th92877.html
White on white on white.........
For the last six months, I’ve been re-watching LOST (yes, all of it), and recently finished up season five. Meanwhile, two astonishingly illegible post-its have been taped to my desk. Their purpose? Tracking the violent acts of characters in the show. Here’s what I have so far–I typed out the numbers because even my tallies are hard to read (let’s remember I literally failed handwriting in 2nd grade):
Santorum: I would totally win
Your enemies, with nodding of their plumes,
The 2012 Academey Awards took place last weekend. The Oscars are one of the biggest awards for actors and actresses, so the stars needed to look their best. Who do you think succeeded at looking their best? Who do you think royally screwed up? Anyone that I missed? Place your votes (and comments) below!
Measure and cut your Ribbon. (hint: I cut my ribbon with pinking shears so it wouldn't fray)
"While the process the doctors followed may have alerted cardiologists to those echocardiograms that were most likely to be abnormal, the failure to read the echocardiograms in a timely manner is inexcusable and may have placed patients at risk,” Alan D. Aviles, hospitals corporation president, said in the statement."
Thursday - Organic frozen stir fry mix with organic chicken
This is totally inappropriate spending of public money. -Bev Butler
in Bangladesh last weekend, Secretary of State Hillary Clinton was confronted with a question she said "hurts me so much."
Glen Goldsmith ~ I Won’t Cry ~ RCA ~ 1987
Occasionally, if I want something more edgy, I’ll pop into Arden B or Bebe. Macy’s “Inc.” and Michael Kors departments are nice too. Other clothing stores I like, but don’t shop at much, are Anthropology and J Crew.
Miracle of Forgiveness: A 1969 book by then-apostle Spencer W. Kimball outlining various sins and the imperative to “triumph” over them all. The book explains that when Jesus said his yoke is easy and his burden is light, he meant that forgiveness comes only after strenuous effort and a lot of pain and suffering. The book focuses in part on sexual sins, whether petting, the more-grievous heavy petting, and the gateway to homosexuality, masturbation.
2: To buy a magnifying glass.
And no, those are no real cupcakes ;). They're cupcake shaped salt and pepper shakers, aren't they sweet :)?
For us, the world of what could be, of learning and experiencing new things, is what gives us comfort and strength - and the courage to try and do more. The world of possibility is our refuge from a more regular, staid life. The world of possibility provides us with energy, memories, and inspirations that many people draw from a more traditional perspective on "home", but which for us emanates from the heart and from new places and experiences.
Red lipstick.
Loneliness strikes when one least suspects,
The ending of the story, though quite vexing to the reader - and possibly where that reviewer hinted at a Twilight allusion - does allow the author to add another sequel, which is hopefully in the works.
Whistle Blow Out
Afterwards, I felt a pang of fear. I guess I tend to forget that the world isn’t as safe as I would like to think it is, and my other half has instructed me not to go walking in that type of situation without him or somebody else with me.
For a minute, my competitive side pouts a little: why isn’t my baby crawling like these other babies? why hasn’t she even gotten on all fours and rocked? why isn’t she pulling herself up on the table? or standing by herself? Like I want my baby to be the first to do EVERYTHING so that I have bragging rights.
Shooting the Boh ~ by Tracy Johnson (Borneo)
The American Freedom Riders began their campaign knowing they would be arrested, or worse, beaten to within an inch of their lives. They made a decision – “Jail No Bail.” People thought they were crazy, but they continued on their ride to freedom and despite the arrests and vicious beatings they prevailed.
"But there are no trees up there!" Miguel Loco will chuckle.
We don't get a lot of one on one bonding with him.
"Jerusalem artichokes." He looks around - to our left are the Monterey artichokes, and to our right are some jumbo-sized even rounder artichokes that looked like this:
500g tenderstem broccoli
Number 12 With a Bullet: The Death of Vocalist Walter Scott
Without men and women willing to put their lives on the line, civilisation and society as we know it could not exist.
I glanced at the wallpaper of my cellphone. Aubrey set it to a picture of she and I that she took with my phone at the track meet Friday night. And, as I looked at it, I thought of the numerous people in my life that have done so much for me. I seem to think about them quite often—and it becomes more apparent when it is written—but I don’t do it without reason.
See the ring around the candle....
‘Nothing really, just my reflections.’
Have you missed us? From June 12-17, both Julie and Melissa attended the 1st annual MidWest Oboe Camp. We had a blast! There were 15 oboists in attendance, as well as 5 bassoonists. We had campers from as far away as Minnesota, Georgia, and North Carolina! Both Julie and Melissa served as instructors, along with Lisa Sayre and Robert and Bailey Sorton. Workshops included discussions on how and what to practice, improving tonguing speed and intonation, introduction to extended techniques (such as circular breathing and double and triple tonguing), demonstrations on the entire oboe family (musette, oboe, oboe d’amore, english horn, and bass oboe), and much more! Daily reedmaking workshops helped students learn the basics of reedmaking and develop their skills. The week ended with chamber performances from all students as well as an encore performance featuring all 20 oboists and bassoonists!
Philip Hayes, 67, Northport, N.Y.
Now that Spring break is over and all is quiet around here I thought I would share a few of the details of our kitchen makeover. I have to be up front with you........ this "makeover" was a LONG process for us as we just weren't sure what we wanted to do. And because I have agonized over whether or not I ought to paint oak cabinets.... you know because of how it might affect resale value. But well, this is OUR HOME.... and WE are living here so we NEEd to do what is best for us (or in this case best for me.... trust me, I'm the only one who spends much time in the kitchen and I LOVE spending time in there now!)
The senator-judge questioned Morales’ testimonies, saying the AMLC report she presented was supposed to be inadmissible.
What is a KERS system?
that I was dreading
My fear of bicycles stuck with me for over a decade. While all my friends were riding their awesome bikes around town making badass motorcycle noises and popping mad wheelies, I was the weird kid running behind them, trying but failing to maintain some semblance of dignity.
Most vital issues
UPDATE: Exciting news! The message got through! As you may have noticed, the name of the recipient of Bill's Bayou's prize-winning tagline was X'ed out, and this was at the request of none other than he himself! Yes, at 2:51 PM, 11/17/09, we received a response from our unnamed honcho at Permission Interactive, and the result is... IS...
I haven't quite run out of ideas, yet!
Wok Charred Salmon ($22++)
Having been blind-sided by cancer, she titled her book Bright-Sided, after the assaults on realism with which governments and corporations work to reduce scrutiny, criticism, and the impulse to reform.
My father passed away and suddenly there was a vacuum in her life. Tired and broken from the struggles of life she intended to live quietly in some old age home but we insisted that she start her life afresh.
Naidoo said Lazarus pretended to make official visits to the resort, but friends and family accompanied him and his trips there were always over long weekends and holidays.
So I have mentioned the Millennium Spire and Molly Malone. There is a third statue of note in Dublin that we didn’t see but that we read about and that the tour books and bus drivers told us about. It’s a statue of James Joyce that the locals affectionately call “The prick with the stick.” If you click the link you can see a picture of the statue. I can’t help but laugh whenever I think of the colorful nicknames the locals gave to sites in their city.
Change can be hard sometimes. You get locked into certain ways of thinking, however damaging or destructive they may be, and you become comfortable with them; they become almost a crutch, an excuse to stay complacent. Believe it or not, this can be the case with misery as well—especially that of the self-pitying kind. To actually have to change your whole outlook regarding a certain situation, to step outside of your comfort zone in order to try to effect that positive outcome you so desperately desire: For some, the prospect of doing so can be so immediately daunting that it's much easier to retreat to the idea that you can't change who you are, that there isn't much you can do to change the way things are going in your life in the moment. Retreating to such an arguably defeatist attitude can become perversely pleasurable in a way: It temporarily takes the load off of you actually having to do anything—at least, until the next situation comes along, as it inevitably will, and you're once again faced with the same choice.
Scrappy Cat clear stamp set "FLIGHTS OF FANCY"- 7.00 BRAND NEW
deceitful and wicked.
but because God loves me more than I can ever understand.
Since we're making you wait so much, here's a little summary of what's coming soon...
Do you run your vehicle below a 1/4th of a tank of fuel before filling up?
He felt OK. People seemed to take it in their stride. End of interview.
Session 3
I am not a doctor and all I know about medical stuff is what I hear and see on television shows whether they are real or not, but if I ever get my hand screwed up like that I hope it is possible to fix it the way Callie did. Seriously, get me a doctor like that for multiple reasons! I love that woman. She’s a wonderful actress who has chemistry with everyone. The scene between her and the patient when he pulled that wood carver out of his bag … brilliant. The scene between her and April during the surgery … amazing. Callie and Arizona … that’s love.
12 Open Your Heart
And what a welcome sound they made!
This months seizure figures represent at least 19 dead elephants, bringing the total since this time last year to at least 3,228 *
I drove toward it starving, seeking a clear stretch of pasture on higher ground, any place that would let me see it better, so I could swerve onto the shoulder and take a picture before it was gone forever. But I was stuck to a track, bound to the center lane, to the trees that conferred around me and swallowed the sky whole.
4) If you are using uncooked rice, use 1 cup for the above said quantity. Wash the rice 2 or 3 times and cook it as per the instructions given in the pack.Once the rice is cooked, transfer it to a wide plate and allow it to cool. Cooked and cooled rice will workout very well for this fried rice.
WHY IT MATTERS: Darwinian evolution is bad science because it is really just philosophy (naturalism) masquerading as science. You can’t marry anyone who pre-supposes a materialist view of metaphysics like naturalists do, and then allows that philosophical assumption to overrule the scientific evidence. You don’t want to be paired up with someone who lets their prejudices overturn data.
Take your children to the playground. They will love playing with the dinosaur. The playground overview the lake – great scenery!
Z is for zone, as in writing in the zone.
2. Can't Fight This Feeling
Amazon Best Sellers Rank: #1,585 Free in Kindle Store (See Top 100 Free in Kindle Store)
Malaysian has until today chosen not to accede to the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights (entered into force in 1976), the International Covenant on Economic, Social and Cultural Rights (entered into force in 1976), the International Convention on the Elimination of All Forms of Racial Discrimination (entered into force in 1969) and the Convention Against Torture and Other Cruel, Inhuman or Degrading Treatment or Punishment (entered into force in 1987).
Some of these "Saints" are known to me personally, others may be writers, artists or musicians etc. The one thing that they will all have in common is that they all add, in their own way, to the sum of human happiness. In however great or modest a fashion, they make the world a better place to live in. They appear in no particular order of merit.
Have you found yourself saying “D’oh?” Is your dad a big wheel down at the cracker factory? Have you ever wondered what Duff Beer tastes like? Does your favorite family consist of five dysfunctional yellow people? If you answered yes to any of these, go ahead and click play below!
The school set up is very interesting I think. You can see how communal and fluid teacher-teacher, student-student and student-teacher relationships are here. Students stay in their own rooms for and between classes, it is their home room rather than the teacher’s room/office as it was for my public schools. There is a 10 minute break between each class and students visit other classes or hang out and generally make a lot of noise.
Daniel and The Greater Works Team
Yes, these wankers think it's fine to have a cartoon series about Jesus Christ - yet they backed down when the Muslim world objected to their Big Guy being in South Park. Yes Comedy Central - you are a bunch of spineless wankers - take a bow!
The 2 gallons of pears roughly made about 4 pints of butter. Just to get an idea of how much water is reduced.
(a) air quality management;
Health Trainer at Foxhill Forum – The Health Trainer supports people to improve their health and wellbeing. Individuals can be supported to put together a personal plan which includes small changes or goals which can improve their health and wellbeing. Referrals from Practitioners is welcomed. Clients can also self-refer. Cost: FREE Contact: Scott Antcliffe, Foxhill Forum – 0114 231 5522
~ Each entry must have a link back to my blog or button
that you place your mind in, before you sit and wait
Jonah clarifies that Stults received a note prior to being murdered and Marshall shows the one that he received that morning, attached to an arrow that was shot through his window. Jonah decides to stick close to Marshall for the rest of the day. As they ride along, Jonah spies a deadfall covered with loose branches and leaves. Jonah dismounts and pulls back to expose the pit, filled with sharpened stakes. When Jonah stand up and turns he finds that the Indian has managed to drop a rope from a nearby tree and lynch Marshall.
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to hide myself out of this shame of me as judgement, and for not realizing that what I am attempting to hide is consciousness itself as if it was my secret from where I cannot alter or correct myself or even see what I am doing.
It just isn’t always possible for a farmer or rancher to pay the cost of their child’s tuition. Family farms are not multimillion dollar operations like the corporations own. They need the entire family to keep things afloat from year to year and season to season. They want their children to be educated and come home to help run the business. It is a business for the family, but it is also a way of life.
I knew I was changing Justin’s life by bringing him in to this huge family, but I suppose in the throes of romantic bliss, it was pretty easy to see only the good things this would add to his life. Sure, my time and my money would have to be shared much more widely than he or I was used to, but he would be gaining siblings and playmates and people in his life who could teach him things that I couldn’t.
One funny thing is that I actually had to move on to a second bottle because I broke my first one! I was just drinking out of it and it started to crack (either I drank it to death, or it was just poor thai construction).
Well, Tom has been a little crabby lately and so I wanted to make him something special. In his pre-Vegan days, Tom loved crab cakes. I tasted them just once when he ordered them several years ago on City Island. Honestly, I didn't like them much.
PS. Teagan did not want to make us throw her to the coyotes. She was a good girl tonight! Well, with only a little crying, but that’s not really out of the norm for her on a Friday after a week of no naps.
3. Ungodly Reanimation
Those of you who enjoyed John-Paul Flintoff's Through the Eye of a Needle will be pleased to hear of his involvement in a new project to inspire and empower us all. I suppose we should not be surprised to learn that John-Paul's new endeavour has been inspired, at least in part, by Tolstoy. I have been following the latter's work with avid interest over the past few months. He was particularly lucky to have counted one of the 19th-centuries greatest painters, Ilya Repin, as a friend, so that his PR was in safe hands.
If it means that the adherents of Left Wing ideologies continue to pick out and isolate the British National Party for this then so be it!
Word of advice for attendees and volunteers: have your "elevator pitch" ready. The ubiquitous conversation opener at the conference is "What are you writing?" The person asking may be another aspiring author, an agent, or an editor. The opportunity to pitch your project may occur at any time.
It was the first thing she told Meg when she planted herself in the room’s only chair, “When you’re feeling up to it, there’s an entire list of people who want to see you. All the doctor wants is for you to open your eyes so they can move you to a room.” With only health in her thoughts, it was only fitting that something be prepared for Meg when she was up and around. Shampoo and soap, an easy fitting robe and something easy to put on and wear once the hospital discharged her.
2. Machinegun riff. Double bass. Bolt Thrower "Promises and LIES." The song's 'Entrenched', off of "Those Once Loyal", their best, and last album. How can a band so old pull off such a strong final record? I don't expect them to top this, I really don't expect them to put out any more records after it, frankly. Some people call this death metal, I don't hear it in there anymore, it's just very linear, very muscular Heavy Metal. The core melodic ideas and riffs could be found in the repertoire of a NWOBHM band, really. It's just the execution that is idiosyncratic (and so often copied!). It's impossible for this music to not induce some physical reaction for this listener, but since my cat is in my lap, in lieu of headbanging, I tapped the double pass patterns on the desk with my fingers. Metal (the polite way).
Once vehemently opposed to the very concepts of marriage (a patriarchal institution to be dismantled) and motherhood (see previous brackets) Alyena and Cat are now married and raising a son together.
It’s also true in the spiritual sense: Whether churches, or individual believers…if a healthy relationship with the Lord Jesus is present, we will grow.
Somehow they’d both ended up lying beside each other on the sheet. Matt propped his head on his hand, and looked down at her. “I’m glad you came. I wanted to share this with you.”
It’s been a while since I’ve written about Supernatural (all here, actually.), but as my viewing has brought me pretty much up to date, I thought I’d talk about the evolution the show seems to have undergone. When last I wrote, I had just started watching season 2. At that point, the show was still very much in the ‘monster of the week’ vein and only superficially attended to issues of global or theological import. The focus was very much on the Winchester family and the things that affect them personally. We were only just beginning to see the wider hunter world.
XOXOX
It has been a complicated, crazy week in the world of Anthro-blogging. When the story broke on Get Off My Internets, then trickled to other blogs and websites, eventually leading Roxy to issue a very useful list of best practices to avoid being scammed on Effortless Anthropologie, I (frankly) was busy with non-blog responsibilities. The very stuff that enables my consumption by providing me with stable employ was making it hard for me to keep up with this rapidly unfolding situation. What was probably for the best as a little distance was really helpful.
AND I WILL WIN!!!
You can learn more about defending the resurrection on historical grounds by getting books by people who know how to make the case for the resurrection in formal academic debates. Mike Licona, for example, has debated skeptics like Bart Ehrman many times.
Terence Weldon, an astute commentator and blogger on Catholic LGBT issues, made the following point on QueeringTheChurch.com:
But it didn’t last long, a month maybe, and I was back at Church, on my knees weeping, asking forgiveness for my failure to stay on the path. So I sang, and I danced, and I shouted Amen, and I spoke in tongues. And this time when I went home, I didn’t struggle. I rendered unto Caesar the things which were Caesar’s, and unto God the things that were God’s. In this case, the God that I worshiped was in rural Illinois and my normal life; school, immediate family, friends, these things belonged to the secular world of Caesar. That was my last summer in the Church.
He finally broke the suspense and asked us what we did.
Tory Burch wedges
I could say that there is more joy in heaven and so on but this man is such a hypocrite that I would accept absolutely nothing he says as a simple and sincere truth. The legislation itself is a measure of his hypocrisy, a bone to the urban dogs of the Labour Party, a bone to that clique of weirdo inbreds delighting in stupidity. Those of you who know anything about it will understand that it is all sound and fury signifying nothing. It’s hopeless legislation, impossible to understand even more impossible to enforce, so much so that the police don’t even bother.
Woo hoo Alyson!
The weather was as predicted and the trail conditions quite sloppy but I felt great. I mean from the first mile I felt really good and this lasted all the way to the finish. Pirates Cove is an uphill start and those that know me know I suck at those but I was just fine. I was running so well I pulled back on the throttle fearing that I was going out too fast. About an hour into the race, as it usually happens, I switched into my "endurance gear", that state of being where I feel I can run strong for a very long time. This was where it got really fun, we were on a very muddy and slippery fire road going downhill and I just bombed the heck out of it I was feeling so good. There were a couple of times where I slid around the corners with arms pinwheeling in the air but thankfully I never went down. At about 16 miles into the race I stopped getting passed and I just tried to hold on and chase after as many runners as I could on the way to the finish line. At the top of the last climb, about mile 25, I looked back and saw a runner charging hard. He had made great time up the hill, I know because I had looked back halfway up and didn't see him, now all of a sudden there he was. He was tall, wore all black except for a white cap which made him easy to spot. Seeing him close on me put extra energy on my legs. I already knew he was faster on the uphills so I ran hard hoping to keep him away on the rolling terrain of the ridge. Well I did manage to keep him from closing the gap but he was still there, white cap just visible on some of the turns. On the last downhill I poured it on confident that I was faster on the downhill, nope no dice there either. At the bottom I spotted him on the switchback just above me. The last flat 2 miles to the finish was just an all out haul, whatever was left. I really thought I was going to get caught. I didn't relax until I was 400 yards from the finish. I crossed the finish line at 4:48:35 for 5th place. The guy right behind came in only a couple of minutes after I did. I thanked him for my great finish time and we spent a few minutes talking about the race.
Bo Bunny is one of those ranges that just make you want to scrapbook! Their Etcetera range is GORGEOUS! So join us for the most awesome class that you will ever attend! For the cost of the course you will get to create 8 double layouts (filled with the most yummy and delightful bits & bobs). All those extras that Bo Bunny sells that you always see in store but you weren't sure how to use ... Ada will show you how to use them all to create these 8 masterpieces ... Here are some sneak previews:
3. What’s your favorite part of the book so far?
No matter how many times I hear this song, it always has a knack for relaxing me and never seems to get old. Kinda like limoncello in Italy.
The producers explained that the hardest part of the show is watching these individuals do things that are wrong, and having to sit there and let it happen. One example of this is on the “True Life: I’m Moving to New York” episode where the girl on the show is trying to find her way on the subway to make it to an interview, but she gets on the wrong train. The producer knew it was the wrong train, and the girl on the show even asks the producer if it’s the right one (not shown on the actual episode but it was shown in this special), but the producer can’t say anything because that wouldn’t be real life.
Just down Shoreline Blvd you'll make a lefthand turn and you're pretty much at Google. Google is not one building. Like many other high tech companies there are many sprawled out across blocks or miles into a large campus of buildings. At Google their main campus is called the Googleplex.
last weekend it was the 3 shires, our most local event, about 2 miles away. we bimbled round with nick ham (thanks for the company!)over very familiar territory (so much so i never referred to the map) and saw will meridith and simon moorehouse (also on the mend) along the way. they really do put on a good event for which everyone is exceptionally grateful.
-Incumbents shall not use any public conveyance, employees or materials for campaign purposes. Any campaigning during the regular business hours of the incumbent shall result in immediate termination of their public service. Misuse of public funds shall be prosecuted to the full extent of the law.
When I was planning the goat shed and pen I sought the advice of other local goat owners as to specification of height, square footage and materials. All agreed 2x4 no climb woven fencing would be my best bet for containment, and for nearly a year it had proven sufficient. Yes, Paul was gone. Escaped. (Never saw him again.)
There is no shortage of posts and articles outlining Facebook, Twitter and blogging etiquette. However, I haven't found any articles that are dedicated to outlining behaviors online and offline. Here are some useful links on twitter and blogging etiquette. My personal opinion in the next part will not outline the issues already discussed in the following links.
Attempts to contact him Tuesday were not successful.
There is no doubt that this kind of eating arises from an emotional component. In addition to stimulating brain reward centers, sweet food markedly affects stress hormones in ways likely to provide a sense of temporary reprieve from anxiety. Of course, in addition to all the health problems linked to binge eating, the eater is likely to end up in a worse spot, much as the alcoholic who drinks to forget that he has an drinking problem. As the tone of your question attests, out-of-control eating can be a profound source of shame and frustration and can therefore contribute psychologically to the development of depression.
Host pastor of First Baptist Church Orlando, Fla., David Uth, made his call to action was a call to care for each other. Scores of tough, strong men came forward to write their specific needs on note cards. Then in like numbers men came forward to meet those very needs. We didn’t say, “Be warm, be filled.” We said, “If you have a need, come forward. If you can help, come forward.”
I have to admit patience is a virtue I will have to learn through this process..... Followed up with our home study agency. They have been so busy that they have NOT finished our report yet and it has NOT been forwarded to the AB government for their approval and it is looking like next week... Not very happy, but I am told nothing is fast during this process. I have to admit I am afraid that the longer time goes by the harded it gets to finish an adoption. It also seems like everyone else is stepping ahead in the process and we are step farther to reaching our child. I can not wait for the day we are all home together.
3/4 cup shredded sharp Cheddar cheese
This past weekend was Confirmation weekend. It means the Confirmation class, who has been meeting nearly every week for 3 months, finished their classes and had the opportunity to become members of the church.
i swear, if i am fortunate enough to live as long as she has, i have learned my lesson! be joyful in every moment, give more than you receive and be grateful for the marvelous quality of life that you have!
There are two methods of cooking the chicken -- poaching and steaming. I had originally intended to steam the chicken, but I don't have a great steaming solution, especially not for that much chicken, and I was short on time. So instead I went with the poaching method, which is apparently more traditional anyway. I think I used a bit too much water, because my chicken didn't develop the desired aspic. :( I'll try steaming next time and see if that gets me better results.
One of my big lessons in my Walk was this huge and powerful reminder to listen to the nudges. If I tune them out, how can I possibly be the hands and feet of Christ? Loving others and putting that love into action is far more than just making a list of good deeds to accomplish. It's not a checklist of "OK, I donated to the food pantry so I fed the poor and I went on a mission trip so I cared for the world and I wrote a check to whatever organization so I was generous and I didn't flip off that bad driver so I showed mercy." I had a huge wake up call a few years back to the importance of doing what is asked and not just doing what seems to be the "Christian thing" to do. When I'm listening and doing what is asked, I get pushed way outside of my comfort zone 95% of the time. When it's His plan and not mine, I often find myself shaking my head and wondering where this next step is going to take me. When I am fulfilling what I know to be His call, I end up overwhelmed by His power and consumed with His love.
If no other thing is clear, understand this: Joker uses sexuality as a weapon. He will do anything under the sun to hurt. It’s not about sex for him, but about pain.
Normally, when I start writing something, I have some idea of the plot. Even for short stories, I will have a fairly detailed plan of what the plot is and where the story is going. I find it hard to make headway into the tangled depths of the story if I don’t have some kind of map figured out first.
The Book of Illusions drew me in from the first sentence and because I couldn't put it down I (sadly) only got to know the characters for a very, very short period of time.
Extremism is a good example of its negative, sometimes destructive, effects. So is racialism.
Right now it's not a priority as it would be good to get the second album finished and have a stronger repertoire before people start noticing us. We have a notion to do one-off events as opposed to trawling the usual venues, etc... partly down to my mild agoraphobia. If that becomes an issue though, particularly as Honey is keen to play live, I might have to do a Brian Wilson and send somebody in my place.
Management Support Team
Update: Congrats to our winner Katrina Page!
Achieving G-Spot Orgasm G-spot orgasms generally require long, sustained stimulation, especially when you’re first starting to explore them. The man-from-behind position is great for G-spot stimulation, but remember that since it’s located on the belly-button side of the vagina, he needs to penetrate at an angle that pushes his penis against the front wall of the vagina.
But in a post a while back, Tim Stretton pointed out that influence in literature, and especially in genre works, has a bi-directional time flow. Before you think I’m referring to some sort of quantum effect, let me hasten to explain: Tim was simply saying, rather more eloquently than this, that while it is obvious that books affect other books that come after them, it is equally true that how books are seen is greatly affected by later books. This is true for each reader—which is why Tim cautions that re-reading favorites is a risky business—but also true for the story-consuming public as a whole.
The obvious answer is to build more houses, but the planning system is rigged against this. There is a housing development going up where I work. The development consists of affordable flats in a middle class surburban area. The middle class suburbanites have opposed the development at every stage. Among the reasons they give is that the development will create an overdemand for local schools. Many homeowners don’t care about poor people having somewhere to live. They don’t want working class children in their schools.
1/2 cup Thick 'N Chunky Salsa
The Sec. of State said she will soon be announcing a commission to look at how the Welsh Government gets its money, and how to make Welsh ministers more accountable for the money they spend - an end to power without accountability. This was perhaps the most significant part of her speech. Again, there is no way Labour would deliver on anything like this.
There are few places in our culture where that’s more apparent than sex.
Not much else to tell you really as, apart from doing educational things with the children and shuffling around the caravan wheezing and taking up space, there isn't much left to write about! Oh, the house-spider season has started officially. I was sitting on my bed this morning when a large one came legging it over the top of my bolster cushion and across the duvet! I am A LOT better about large spiders than I used to be though and I'm not sure if this is because of the therapist I went to see in 2004 after nearly killing myself on the stairs after finding a spider under a cuddly toy, or because of my children, who are pretty relaxed around spiders. When the children were little, I used to deliberately go on "spider-finding-missions" where I would find a garden spider and show it to the baby/toddler and point out all the pretty stripes and colours and give it a cute little voice! Likewise, I used to try to hide my terror when finding a large spider in the house as I really didn't want to pass this phobia onto the next generation. Anyway, it worked and now I have children who can safely catch the big spiders and take them outside for me and watching the children being relaxed is slowly making me feel happier. All the same, I'll be glad when the spiders settle down into their Winter homes and stop dashing across the floors and surprising me in the shower!! Eeek!!
It is in the nature of thinking that it thinks of and invents the unconditioned as an adjunct to the conditioned; just as it thought of and invented the "ego" as an adjunct to the multiplicity of its processes; it measures the world according to magnitudes posited by itself--such fundamental fictions as "the unconditional","ends and forms.
Paul says in Romans 12:2…
Having an autumn birthday seems kind of awesome, if only for the seasonal food themes that spill over into dessert. Particularly pumpkin, to which I am a recent convert. After failing to see the point of pumpkin desserts most of my life, I made these chocolate-pumpkin tartlets and have had to rethink my whole position on this matter. Seeking to explore the combination further, I volunteered to follow up my first-time catering gig with a November birthday cake for SP's husband without revealing my agenda.
Later that night, Furry Husband got home. His eyebrows went up in a question... he picked up the empty tall boy of Budweiser Clamato beer.
Instantly, I fell in love.
Do unison activists in england, wales and northern ireland have something to learn from our colleagues in scotland?
'You are about to send 'Useless WIP' to the recycle bin, are you sure?'
Made in the USA: Knowledge Construction and Social Action
During the first few posts, we will refer to the Arduino website, and the book:
Wednesday 23rd - 6pm
Basic Grey "Pryus" - Bradford Paper (Scraps)
Cruising the net.
“Jesus, Charlie. Those are not friends at the weekly. They’re your enemies. They put money on the table to take money off the table. It’s an investment.”
They say form goes out the window in cup football, but the way Palace have performed thus far in the competition suggests to me that they’ll edge through to Wembley. And they’ll have certainly have earned their spot there.
But luck was on my side! I checked the site again a few days later and they were back in stock. Well, just the first one. I bought, played it, loved it, and bought the second one just before I completely beat the first. I now am missing on one more in the .Hack GU series... and its price is ridiculous. 29.99 is the lowest i can find that currently has the game in stock. Used. Everywhere else is ass loads more expensive or no longer available. I'm sad that Best Buy shows Volume 3 at 24.99 but has been unavailable for weeks. Don't get me wrong, 24.99 before shipping and handling is still ridiculous, but I'm willing to deal with that.
Come to the edge.
So can we do that everyone? Can we think of the poor, poor chickens? Aren’t chickens–like women–livestock too? I know they lay eggs, but sometimes those eggs are empty, and then used in Easter egg hunts.
"What is the best over-the-counter medication for...?
I am missing home. Not the ungodly heat that is still holding Austin in its hellish grip, but the kid, the husband, the dawg and kittehs. Yes, and even the leopard gecko. I am also missing my full-size shower and private place to, you know, doo-doo. Plus, when you're an old lady such as myself, there are at least a couple of instances of getting up in the middle of the night to tinkle. And having to stumble half-asleep down the hall and into a brightly lit communal bathroom to do so is not as much fun as you might imagine.
☺ Save it in a new folder, where you'll save also the background image. This passage makes easier the writing of the position of the image into the code.
I stood there stunned for a second but then survival mode kicked back in.
Where there is error, the truth;
And a glory that shines upon our tears.
I want the future to be full of these kids. I want these kids, as adults, to know that should Billy ignore them (and the communication is important), they should try to ask a new way. I want these kids to retain their acceptance and their lack of judgement. I want them to grow up knowing that making an effort with Billy is worth it. I want them to avoid falling into the shallow pit of fatuousness that says anyone who is different is automatically stupid and open for derision (or worse).
Nope, not yet. My husband was hand chosen to transfer to different command on the same installation, and here we stay-- maybe 2 years, I am hoping just a year. I could dwell on the fact that I am stuck in a rut, or I can see how I am going to change my attitude for the better. I choose to make things happen.
Then the ends of the taps saying HOT and COLD fell off.
(4) For example, “feet” is a frequent euphemism for sexual organs, as in the reference to the seraphs in Isaiah 6:2: “Each had six wings: with two he covered his face and with two he covered his feet and with two he flew.”
If I did give away the last
I have a lot to write about but I want to make sure blogger is still working before I pour my heart and soul into this.
1. Obey the first time
To look for an out of town relative letter.
So I think I can write in pretty much any style and make the result seem fairly fluent.
4. L has not yet given them the names of the 40 awesome single women she knows not looking for players or casual anything.
Bitter herbs- (Horseradish) is a reminder of the bitterness of slavery and suffering endured in Egypt.
Yep. That’s it. People (Don) want new design (cos the old one ist just meh presumably, like the iPhone 4S…what a turd…). Nevermind those “couple additions here and there”, nope. He wants “a host of features” – none of which he specifies, but I guess it’s just easier to demand stuff than to actually come up with meaningful additions.
Sunday we had to head South to sort through my grandmother's estate. That was really hard. I am happy I got to take home some of her good antiques and things that were special to her. My dad and uncle are having an estate sale this coming weekend and it will be very hard to see all of her things go with strangers :( But she had far too many things for even all of us combined to take. Nanny had very unique pieces, an amazing collecting of primitive antiques (17 & 1800s), which are hard to really incorporate into most decors. We all kept what we wanted and the rest is to be sold.
College student, Bookseller, Book blogger and all around Book Addict.
Overall Impression (2)
I just put it all in the food processor, but you can chop the tomato, onion and garlic into cubes if you want it to be more aesthetic.
So now it’s time for our leads to reunite which means Ah Jung gets to repay her loan. She goes to his hotel and waits for him to finish his marriage date but in an effort to eavesdrop, leans into her chair, falls down and spills juice all over herself. Ki Joon recognizes her and instead of letting one of the staff take care of the situation, decides to end his date in order to carry Ah Jung across the hotel and into a room, giving one of Ah Jung’s friends the chance to spot her in his arms. And this is how the lie snowballs.
Time for me to cover a classic! It’s getting really hard for games made back in 1998 to stand out against today’s market, especially an RPG. See, the majority of RPG games back then have that one defining feature, and everything else has aged rather badly. Wild Arms…did EVERYTHING right. So I think it’s a crime that the game’s been overlooked in favour of stuff like Final Fantasy 7 and stuff.
Borion Enterprise Ltd, is part-owned by a Sarawak timber magnate Ngui Ing Chuan, a major shareholder of the Taib-linked company Ta Ann. Ngui also owns Borion Enterprise Sdn Bhd and Borion Shipping Sdn Bhd, both Malaysian companies based in Sarawak.
For the benefit of what few of you here reading don’t already read everyone else’s oft-more-updated and finer blogs in Nashville and in Tennessee, the Nashville flood finally got some national attention, though I’m not sure it really would have much if not for all the Tweeting and blogging there was about it. MSNBC was one of the first to give it decent air time, here and with another mention from Keith Olbermann that I think, in particular, was much appreciated by the community at large.
HAPPY almost weekend, everyone! - i just dropped Kayleigh off @ the vet - her back tooth was half out, so she's getting a cleaning and some blood work done to make sure she's A-OK! .. she was a nervous wreck taking the drive over to Staten Island .. i can not wait till i can pick her up later today! - but she's in good hands - Joe's sister works @ the vet .. so i know she'll be getting extra TLC or there will be a serious price to pay - teehee!
I now know how I got it wrong before with the dried stuff, i.e. they must be soaked for a very long time like overnight to 24 hours before cooking. If not they will not cook through easily and by the time they are stewed and softened on the inside the outside surface will be too gloppy and slimy. The next step is to boil them for few minutes before adding to the stir fry mixture.
I had heard about Nikki Sivils products, but I never had the pleasure of working with them, until now. Because of my role in Scrapping Everyday Miracles I have been secretly working with some of these products, that reveal will be fully shown very soon!
Anyway, I’m not reviewing Jumping the Broom (which I actually enjoyed, but maybe my standards are different after 2 a.m.), but it just so happens to jibe almost perfectly with the book I’ve been reading for the last two weeks—Touré’s Who’s Afraid of Post Blackness? What it Means to be Black Now.
8. Spotting opportunities: While looking for opportunities, LG met the Head of ISSC (IBM Subsidiary), Dennie Welsh. The opportunity that Dennie had spotted would change IBM forever. “He told me that his vision of a services company was not one that did just IBM product maintenance and strung together computer codes for customers, he envisioned a company that would literally take over and act on behalf of the customers in all aspects of information technology-from building systems to defining architectures to actually managing the computers and running them for the customers. My mind was afire. To be truly successful, we would have to do things that would shake the place to its roots. For example, the services unit would need to be able to recommend the products of Microsoft, HP, Sun and all other major IBM competitors if that, in fact, was the best solution for the customer. Of course, we would have to maintain and service these products as well.”
selection of different weights & types inexpensively. Instead of sitting on the couch doing nothing while I watch TV I’ve been lifting simple 2-2 lb weights & 2 – 3 lb weights.Also CJ has been staying over a lot lately so while he has been doing his morning routine in the bathroom I've been working out a lil bit w/ some simple stretches and kicks...I love doing kicks...
Monday Hmmmm, I feel pretty crummy. My throat is so sore. Lucky I have the whole week to get better before the concert.
In other news, Ruthie, Andy, and Ellie are hours away from town right now. I still can't believe my baby sister will be a wife this weekend. I'll be back with a report on the real Royal Wedding soon!
Please submit nominations before September 6th, 2010. A submission from individuals or from organizations is easy: name the nominee and the reason for your nomination. Please include your own name (or organizational representation) and your contact information for follow-up.
The Last Temptation of Christ (Peter Gabriel)
The answer to what kind of dog she is remains, "Hell if I know," though we have often suspected she has possum and coyote in her blood, as well as the vet's guess, Catahoula Leopard dog. I am personally inclined to think she's from outer space, especially now that I'm addicted to Doctor Who. And though Ophelia is nothing like the dog I thought I wanted--she is rarely elegant, fierce only when it's inappropriate to be so, possibly belongs in special ed, and too cross-eyed to ever be considered beautiful--she is perfect for me. She is absolutely the dog I needed, even if she's not the one I thought I wanted. And I hope that these ludicrous, hilarious, exasperating, wonderful five years are followed by many more, during which my eternal toddler continues to follow Peter Pan's example... and never grows up.
You got an empty cup
Stamp - PTI Heart Prints
lest we be too sensitive to censure. Let us reckon that to have the
7........I m a blogaholic ....AND I DO NOT WANT TO BE CURED
And the rice? No style at all, none. Plain white. At least it wasn't green.
later, it was easy for people to just take off with nothing more than what
freshly ground black pepper, to taste
"This is to see that you don't have heavy metals on you or something that looks suspicious," said Sela.
Since I blogged last, Daddy has had back surgery and is on the mend. Thankfully, he's feeling much better. He just called me randomly one night and asked me to come to the air strip to help him. He was in the floor and couldn't get up. This event ended with him being escorted to the hospital in an ambulance and having surgery the next morning. He's much better now, though, thank the Lord!
Experimental programs
Green Zebra- 1460 West Chicago Avenue
Suddenly Todd’s face cringed with exasperation. Everyone else started laughing.
HSN CEO Mindy Grossman and CFO Judy Schmeling will do their thing at the conference Sept. 28.
The competition old silvery metal pieces add some staying power in to the monotone hue edinburgh map supply a cutting – edge achieve in the generally sort.
From my very popular silver line.....absolutely love this wine cooler/planter. I am in fact giving this very container to my mother in law filled with a beautiful orchid. When she eventually removes it, it can serve as a very elegant wine cooler/champagne bucket. Reminds me of something you would see being used in a grand hotel in Paris.......love it.
This Manual Has 23 Printed Pages.
My GPS tagged it at 11.3 miles and I found it very demanding. Almost 6 miles of uphill running (455m ascent), and then over 5 miles of down (455 descent).
Tuck Knees and Star Jump: 11/15/12
“Yes.” They answer in unison.
Playlist
The house has proved to need a bit more work doing than it appeared at first. And getting someone to do the work is difficult too. And I still have many things to buy for it. I still have lots of boxes to unpack and I just don't feel like doing it. Part of the reason is the boxes are in my bedroom, which is glacial thanks to a malfunctioning radiator.
The BBC said in an unsourced report at the time of the arrests that they were linked to an investigation into al Qaeda-inspired attacks within Britain.
I have used a Milton & Co stamp coloured with promarkers,
So, the question then is, about how long will it take for Brixton to break into the top 1000 if the popularity of the name keeps increasing at the same rate? For this question I'm a little fuzzy on how to estimate the formula for the curve, but Excel has some cool formulas (LOGEST and LINEST) for estimating logarithmic or linear formulas based on statistical data. So here's a projection based on existing data.
Birth is a sacred time. It impacts women so deeply that they will tell these stories over and over again. It WILL change them. This is not something you can opt out of. Birth is powerful no matter how it is experienced.
In 1981 began a time of terror and death for ANC members in exile. In February a strong ANC National Executive Committee entourage which incuded President Tambo made the rounds of all ANC camps in Angola. Cadres were warned of the presence of a spy network and the need for vigilance was emphasised. Enemy agents and provocateurs were rudely warned by Piliso, in Xhosa, '.. I'll hang them by their balls.' An 'internal enemy' psychosis had been whipped up and whenever ANC leaders visited camps they were heavily guarded. Many men and women were apprehended on suspicion of dissidence were to be exterminated in the most brutal manner in the months ahead. Those disiullusioned MK cadres who returned from Rhodesia were the first to go.(p.49)
Small packages of blessings and all the extra toppings on top
Peanut has been talking since she was 2 months old and I am not exaggerating. Her first word at 8 weeks old was “mama”. She was speaking on a three- four year old level at 18 months. She apparently does not want to share that vocabulary at school. She is extremely quiet her teacher says. As soon as she gets in the car, she is nonstop chatterbox. She tells me all about her day. She is very independent at home. She is new to preschool this year where as all the other kids have been in some kind of program for a long time. She never participated in an Easter Egg hunt before but did quite well with her sister on Easter. She found 18 eggs all by herself. She builds these incredible things out of legos and blocks. She is in ballet and tap. She loves to run and jump and sing.
And so onto the next section of the Tour, a section that would see us get hands on with some of the props, a place where we would meet our greatest foes, say hello to some old friends most people decided to exit throught the door, I thought I’d take the more direct route…
Yesterday I missed a day blogging. Late last night, I texted the Huffington Post blogger and my friend John Fleming and asked if it was better that I miss a day or be boring.
And I thought, at 40 years old, my playground days were well behind me ...
A savage rape on hallowed ground. Secrets buried for decades by the town’s most influential family. Now Ourania D’Andre will learn the Great Oak’s secrets as construction begins at the Fagan mansion. She can’t afford to turn down a job that promises to stir up the long-buried guilt—and the passion—she shares with powerful Troy Fagan. She’s already juggling the most important job of her career with her new responsibilities as a foster mother for young Walt and Emma Korchek. And there’s a hard, older man on the construction crew with eyes void of emotion—cold and killing. The secrets of his brutal past will pose a grave threat to the children in her care. Will she find the courage to face him?
For those of you, who have not yet had the opportunity to read the story, here it is:
You load sixteen tons, what do you get
I don’t want to have to fight for a seat at the table or wait to be invited. I want to be in a place where my seat at the table is a given, where it is taken for granted that I have been called and equipped with gifts and skills for leadership.
House parties are notoriously messy. They begin fine – perhaps a few early birds turn up and there may be an awkward silence, but it turns out that if you throw alcohol at the situation anything can be easily dissolved. It is in fact after you’ve drowned the “situation” that the fun and mess truly begins. One second you’re having a gentile conversation with a friend in the kitchen, sipping away at your single vodka and lemonade and then, before you know it you’re moshing in the front room drinking shots of Schnapps (shouting “Party in t’House!”) while watching complete and utter strangers destroy your home…
This was followed in 1986 by what’s known as the ‘Big Bang’, when a raft of restrictive old practices in the City of London were swept aside. Soon, foreign banks flooded into the City, gobbling up venerable British minnows such as SG Warburg, Robert Fleming and Schroders.
In case that's not clear enough: this is not for the musically timid, weak hearted, or epileptic. I'm fairly certain that if you play this video at appropriate volumes for any extended period of time, the paint may begin to peel off of your walls.
To emphasize my point, here is a list. Can you tell what it's a list of?
Fernando Wood, New York’s mayor at the dawning of the war, was the South’s best friend. The rascally politician, famous during his first term for inciting a police riot, drummed up pro-slavery support amongst his Irish and German constituents and even suggested New York secede from the Union itself! But once the war began and public support for the conflict swelled, the nefarious Fernando tried to have it both ways, both leading the Union cry and undermining it.
So all of my guys got involved with "baiting" the trap--meaning putting a little good-tasting(?) garbage inside it--and trying to catch the beasts that were invading our garbage.
How does LOBG work?
So, a funny thing about my elliptical.
Super Hero Bloggers
Ah, summertime. When a kid can be a kid. And bathing?
I have over 500 pictures to choose from (Im slowly trying to at least get them up on Facebook), tons of schoolhouse info and other news. Hopefully in the next day or two I'll get some quality time with my computer!
meanders down its way
Please check the buyer reviews of Samsung i9100 Galaxy S II Unlocked GSM Smartphone with 8 MP Camera, Android OS, 16 GB Internal Memory, Touchscreen, Wi-Fi, and GPS–No Warranty (Noble Black) on the merchant’s website by click on the link below.
Vanilla or Chocolate Macaroons:
Luke W. Midkiff (percussion on 'Kiss Off')
I’m sitting here thinking, So, what next? The troops continue to be drawn out of Afghanistan as our combat role changes to the supportive role… But will it “take,” so to speak?
I saw a video at You Tube saying that the entire Bible is to reveal who Israel is.
- S$20 for adult
Why do I love Paris? You might as well ask me to fly to the moon… I wouldn’t know where to begin. I do know, that I’ve loved it since I was little. Although, it wasn’t love at first sight when I arrived for good.
Nothing. Well, maybe it depends on what it was I won. Now that Stud is older, I may or may not gloat a bit, mostly because he's a sore loser. But, in general, I don't do anything really.
Matt: Do you know what you’re going to write about tomorrow?
And the Sikh Media Monitoring group described ‘the deliberate and targeted sexual degradation of Sikh women purely because of their religion’ and how a minority of young Muslim men boasted about ‘seducing the Kaffir (unbeliever) women’.
Not a creature was stirring....
So let's welcome the month of May with a Contest.....We have a new stamp company that we are carrying here at It's Always Fabulous....Sweet Stamp Shop..Adorable clear acrylic stamp sets in two sizes - some styles in 4x6 sheets and some styles in 3x5 sheets - but each and every one of them fabulous.
The blessing, the healing, the nation
In the final analysis, it is between you and God. It was never between you and them anyway.
Around my Mom’s dinner table the other night we were having a terrific discussion about miracles. Each one of the participants in the dialogue has a different Faith path, but all share Belief. I found the conversation fascinating simply because I believe in Miracles. They happen so frequently in everyday life and if you are paying attention, you will be able to recognize them. That was the basis of our discussion.
3rd Floor, CRC Tower#303-4
(On Grantland we couldn't actually post the Top Ten Drake Meme images. So I'll do that here because, well, NEVER FORGET)
I think our society over rates monetary success and associates success with having a big house, having 3 cars, being able to go on holidays and live the good life when in fact, these are all relatively superficial symptoms of success. - in Investment Postcards
It is surprising based on their bodies of work thus far – but not at all surprising when you consider their performances on wednesday. AStro didnt even attempt to change his style to fit the genre. Stacey absolutely flatlined on her performance of ‘Its all Coming back to Me’ – in fact, it just reminded me of how talented Celine Dion is… unfortunately, a very bad rendition of the song.
Peace Week in Miss Fox's Class by Eileen Spinelli, Illustrated by
But for some reason I didn't.
To initiate the opportunity for fulfillment
So from now on it’s just a matter of time until I can release the source + the executable.
Maggie's Story
Here are some of the meals that I've served my family in the last few weeks, along with the ones you saw in my other recent post. It's been about a month and we've all lost at least 10 lbs. each, but my hubby has lost about 16 lbs! We've also been exercising regularly too!
So anyway, long story short, we have a preschool plan. I mailed one application yesterday, and will be wading through the application process for the other two in coming days. It is something of a relief to have a plan.
Many thanks for reading and thinking about this. Please do circulate this widely among family and friends. I look forward to hearing your responses at your earliest convenience.
Awkward#2.
They are a priceless part of us, and capture our hearts and souls the instant they are born. From that moment we will do anything to protect and care for them. This is human nature. It is an inborn instinct to safeguard our loved ones and is something we all experience. Whether it is our children, our elderly, our partner, a family member, or even our friends, we all experience protectiveness at one point in our lives. For most of the world’s population, this is an ongoing phenomenon – for life.
I don't have any pictures yet but will try and post some soon.
All the baby clothes, blankets, breast pumping gear, baby toys, and baby books have been dutifully packed up and given away as soon as they were no longer in use. We don't have much (any) storage space, so decluttering this way was a no-brainer.
As far as I’m concerned, a raisin is a poor man’s chocolate chip when it comes to an oatmeal cookie (and maybe everything else). I grew up eating my grandma’s cowboy cookie recipe, which my mother invariably burnt every time. However, dunked in ice-cold 2-percent, crispy chocolate-chip oatmeal cookies became sublimely soggy and the Hershey’s bittersweet chips made my little heart beat a little faster.
The drive itself was good, at least the parts that I remember. It was about 6 hours or so. Because of the early start I was dosing on and off all the time (and I wasn’t the only one). We saw some wildlife. One girl spotted a group of grizzlies on the side of the road. Too bad I didn’t have good optics to see them very well.
This was my last set of beads, made in early december last year.....it has been 6 weeks now since I made a decent bead *snif*
We've had a blast and hope you'll help us make 2012 even more successful.
This series is called Astrology Just For Writers. It can also be used to start learning enough of the magical view of the universe, and how it differs from and incorporates the scientific view of the universe, to create a Magic Realism story.
on the back, a sweet barrette is hand-stitched to hold it in place - they're really sturdy, and i love the contrasting bright colors. such a cute idea!
(Hmm, methinks mayhap, a certain chicken of my acquaintance had something to do with this invasion...)
April 1st: Be The One Run in Tampa (5K)
One word: Experience. From the public speaking to the presentation preparation, these experiences are invaluable. Foundation can be built with books, but personal and professional development mainly relies on experiences and application.
With our vast capacity for self-deception, we need to journey with others who can point out our blindspots and help us grow. They are called blindspots for a reason afterall.
Heraclitus of Ephesus, a Greek philospher said this: Πάντα ῥεῖ καὶ οὐδὲν μένει, meaning, “Everything flows, nothing stands still.”
☆ Capable of single letter, single word or multiple words
‘The Indigo Evolution‘ is a documentary about the shifting human, evolving beyond the five sensory perceptions into a multi-sensory being of light ! The term Indigo refers to the Indigo color Aura seen around certain individuals who exhibit certain enhanced abilities well beyond their age and learning. Commonly labeled as suffering from some kind of deficit (ADD, ADHD, Dyslexia …) these children clearly have more of something most of us fail to recognize. Their non conformance to authority and the social conditioning sometimes earns them the label of being problem children.
Greatest Love of All
*THE MUMMY’S SHROUD – Radio Spot
al-Awlaki had not been charged or convicted of any crime. This was an extrajudicial assassination. Moreover, IANAL, but according to people who are at the American Civil Liberties Union, the killing was ordered and carried out in violation of both U.S. and international law.
The HANDTUTOR, on the other hand, is a small, easy to put on ergonomic glove-like device that fits snugly onto the patient’s hand, allows quite a bit of room to maneuver, is one of the most cost effective medical devices of its type and can be used in the clinic, hospital or even at home through the use of telerehabilitation. Most important, though, is the fact that the patient himself activates the movement and thereby relearns his original skill rather than depending on an outside source to stimulate the limb.
From this terrain sprang the hymn Vexilla regis (The Royal Banners of the King, used in Passion week) written by the Christian poet, Venantius Fortunatus, that exalts Christ who reigns from the height of the Cross – a throne of love and not of dominion: Regnavit a ligno Deus (God has reigned from the tree). Indeed, already during his earthly life, Jesus warned: “Whoever wishes to be great among you must be your servant, and whoever wishes to be first among you will be the slave of all. For indeed, the Son of Man came not to be served but to serve and to give his life as a ransom for many” (Mk 10,43-45).
- I say: I liked the way escalante described ET as the boy with the monkey on the bike flying past the moon.
A first-time violation will result in a $100 fine; however, if officers cite a driver who then buys a hands-free device, there will be no fine, according to the ordinance. Second violations will cost drivers $150, while three or more violations will incur $200 fines.
1/4 cup molasses (NOT black strap)
It was a good start to a winter campaign for Gardener in which he is targeting the Commonwealth Games in Melbourne in March, an event where he will face six of the world’s top 10 sprinters, including the world record holder, Asafa Powell of Jamaica. The European junior 100m gold medallist Craig Pickering, who is now training with Gardener at Bath under the coach Malcolm Arnold, finished runner-up in both races with 10.49 and 10.52.
The ultimate wouldn't be to see Jesus, but for him to see himself in us.
The Slasher's victims number four, and ranged from Chuck Alford and Jim Parker, to Forrest Duke and John Leeman!
So I realize when looking back that a lot has changed, of course, since then and I was thinking about what has changed for the worse and what has changed for the better. I thought I'd make a laundry list--these are just a few off the top of my head, I'm sure there are many more that I'm not thinking of. And then I did another list of a few nice things about the industry that haven't changed at all.
Writing my feelings in this blog is really helping me,I just want to start therapy and then hormones...
Reid: oh stuff it Fluffy
I took a class today with the wonderful watercolorist Rena Brouwer! Unfortunately, I didn't do it justice. She gave lots of great tips and advice - I just couldn't get into it that much today. I don't like my building at all but I'll try again.
I am very snooty about paint colors because of experience! I think of myself as having a very sharp eye when it comes to color but paint and how the light affects it and how it goes on the wall and how much darker or lighter it looks when you use it has been a bad experience for me every time I have used ANY color besides Farrow and Ball's. I am sure that there are plenty of very beautiful colors other places but I have always had great luck with them. I also really like Ben Moore's super white, decorators white, cloud white and patriotic white. My favorite F&B colors are: pointing, clunch, skimming stone, stony ground, bone, mouse's back, elephant's breath, london clay, citron, blazer, book room red, hound lemon, cooking green apple, olive, saxon green, minister green, vert de terre, light blue, cook's blue, chinese blue, drawing room blue, hague blue, down pipe, pelt, tanner's brown, green smoke, off-black. Even though I think every single color is absolutely brilliant.
We have a very generous sponsor this week, Simon Says Stamp! They offered to sponsor a $25.00 gift certificate to our lucky winner today! Shall we find out who won? ;) And what about the Design Team's Top 5 Picks? Should we check that out too? Hmmm....well I guess that is the reason we are here today right? LOL - Alright then! On with the show!
Aside from having the unique midsole technology, Brooks Beast also provides extraordinary cushioning and perfect fitting for overpronators. Always remember that comfort and right fitting are the most important things you should know when buying a pair of running shoes because these factors can affect your performance because if you are not comfortable enough you cannot last long with your activity. You should also have to make sure that your footwear is well-fitted because if you use poor footwear, you can end up with an injured foot which can be very painful. Brooks Beast the other hand is engineered to enhance the comfort and aid in the prevention of running-related injury so can make sure that these shoes can support your feet especially if you have low arches.
Jane Franklin
Thank you for letting me vent and show off how completely imperfect a person I am. The closer I get to Christ, the more I realize how much I need a Savior.
Yes, you read that right. Summorum Pontificum has finally been fully implemented by a diocesan bishop – the Rt Rev Mark Davies, Bishop of Shrewsbury, who has entrusted the Shrine Church of Ss Peter and Paul and St Philomena in New Brighton, Wirral, to the Institute of Christ the King Sovereign Priest. This much-loved building, once known as "the dome of home" to returning sailors, had previously been closed. Bishop Davies saw no reason why this dynamic apostolic institute should not revive it.
This week I have been doing some of the dreaded Christmas shopping and working on felting some yardage for a gift. I want this item to be really warm but not heavy. This has been one of those projects where things go wrong. The first thing was that I started laying it out and discovered that I was not going to have enough of the black short fiber wool. But luck was on my side here because though it was Sunday (they are closed Sunday and Monday) there was a class taking place at New England Felting Supply and Ariel said I could come up and buy more wool. So on Monday I laid out dyed grey silk fabric, two layers of short fiber merino and then some angora that I had left over from when I was raising the rabbits.
would the situation still be the same situation?
She put mayonnaise on the BROWN SIDE!!! I should have known when I took my first bite.. I was thinking "man.. this tastes extra crusty!"
'Just three questions' said St Peter.
8:00 – Francis and the Lights, Penguin Prison, Ryan Holladay @ Bowery Ballroom $15 (18+)
Still, most of it is so good that it hardly matters.
This suited me perfectly as it gave me the chance to concentrate on getting that great image of Barry. Thanks Ben.
Swatched below is the same order but this time I have rubbed them in, so hopefully it shows the warmth of the Chanel.
This screen is total magic to me. It tells me in plain english that if I can commit and be good and follow the rules then I can ACHIEVE my goal by May 20, 2011. That is less that 3 months. YOU GUYS!!! This is the weight that I had looked and and decided to own. It was the weight that I had doomed would be with me until I died. Maybe your goals are different. Maybe I set a small goal for myself. Maybe I’ll never tell. But right here, I learned that the goal was achievable.
because of this very test when even victims AND
I almost feel as though I should be sharing summer recipes with you, instead of this comforting (and delectable) pork stew. Here we are, in the first week of January, with temperatures reaching the 70's and clear blue skies. You'd think I'd rejoice in that, but I really wish it was a cold and rainy day. I'm at the tail end of a much needed two week vacation. I'm also concerned that we might be headed into a drought-- and that's not a good thing. I think of the Salinas Valley growers, and how our crops could be affected. Let's hope that La Niña will bring a lot of states some much needed rain.
NOTE: And so all Israel shall be saved: as it is written, There shall come out of Sion the Deliverer, and shall turn away ungodliness from Jacob: For this is my covenant unto them, when I shall take away their sins.
I'm still pondering how I would like to display them.. on a canvas or a poster board and frame it some kinda way. I would like the piece to be big, around 7' x 5', so maybe rigging some poster board would be ideal.
I believe that the tipping point had already occurred sometime back and any apologism for absolutism and authoritarianism cannot preclude social development not enmired in the worst aspects of feudality. Being just another wakil rakyat, how does the above 3 items sound to Tengku and since Tengku has access to the Royal Malay Court for certain, Tengku should make these most reasonable 3 items a given rather than indicating that the rulers are not to be disturbed. None are interested in disturbing rulers, but rather the apartheid portions of the nature of the constitution. All world citizens expect a certain amount of fairness. Will the Rulers not act as in :
No flailing calf or cat in a flame
3 tomatos
This is why writing and writing A LOT will reveal our true voice. We get time to try the genres we like and if they are a fit? Perfect! If not? We’ll see it sooner.
Annnd everyone else said...
Than anything before it
'Absolutely sure?' I wasn't convinced he was being totally honest with me.
i just had to say the word
The India government’s recent move that would have given unprecedented access to mega retail houses like Wal-Mart to the middle-class market, amid widely feared consequences for small farmers and merchants, had to be put off, at least temporarily, following a huge national outcry.
Your life is your own. Make it your own, and do it your own way. Stop trying to be someone you’re not. I choose to make some follow-up calls today to ensure my customers were happy. As Stella & Dot tells us in our training, it is about planting seeds. I look forward to the day I can harvest the bumper crop. It takes time, and I have faith, and patience is always testing me.
Um.. I didn't. Kerri Sackville is my real name.
- Check out what’s hot and find trending playlists & songs amongst your friends
3And another angel came and stood at the altar, having a golden censer; and there was given unto him much incense, that he should offer it with the prayers of all saints upon the golden altar which was before the throne.
“When you get a good review, you feel good! When you don’t, you just have to realize that you can’t please everybody. We make music for the people who like it, not for the ones that don’t.” (Sass Jordan)
We're going small and simple. No frippery. No frou-frou. No jazz band with second-line strut, although that would be entertaining.
Can’t say. That’s the point of the comic book gutter. It requires the reader to fill in the narrative gap. If you read sex in that space, then sex it is. Frederic Wertham certainly did, and lots of it.
- Her editor changes her reviews regularly, making them better or worse, depending on what partnerships, promotions or freebies are on offer. It also depends if the parent companies - reviewer's publication and book publisher - are linked.
Shall we wait for the day when we witness our government taking a sincere bold step in caring for our children? Or shall we take a stand and protect our children in our own little way?
part of the sky now has to be painted wet on wet until completely finished, one go at it, either it'll work, or I'll have to trash the painting
‘Well hurry up Missy, in two hours you’ll be Ms. Simon Blake!’ Her mother busied around the kitchen.
what means a second of Life, ask that man who has just got away from a car accident
I typically drink two cups of coffee a day. In the morning it’s not really worth noting the expense, since I roast my own beans and thirty dollars in quality, green coffee can last me four or five months. But a cup of coffee from this particular shop-the one I’m going to as I’m stopped by the man with a fuel deficiency-costs two dollars. And then I tip at least fifty cents, because I’ve been that guy behind the counter.
“Commissioner, no need to explain our presence here”
Comments: Effective story describing one human’s feelings of alienation and obsolescence. Similar in theme to del Rey’s story, “The Day is Done.”
Artisans:
By Charles Foerster
a) hid their sexuality for fear of losing their popularity (or just for fear); or
Riegelhaupt's statement continued:
say the DrZap version is the one to have, but this version has its merits as well. Perhaps someone might try to matrix this with the DrZap recording to create a definitive version.
Leaves with me mixed feelings leaving WP Hosting.
7.dead bitch
After an encounter with such menacing buffaloes use to be I would ask myself,
Males with gender identity disorder who are sexually attracted to males tend to present in adolescence or early childhood with a lifelong history of gender dysphoria. In contrast, those who are sexually attracted to females, to both males and females or to neither sex tend to present later and typically have a history of transvestic fetishism. If gender identity disorder is present in adulthood, it tends to have a chronic course, but spontaneous remission has been reported.
hand. It's about 2-3
Before I go into a brief recounting of the epic finale, I want to give thanks to everyone who showed enough interest to come to the local game store on a weekday night and throw dice for a couple hours. It is my great honor to have DM’ed for every one of the players who showed up at my table, numbering in the hundreds of unique players over 70+ weeks of gaming. I met a lot of great players during my run, and had the distinct pleasure of teaching dozens of people the basics of the game, and husbanding them through their initial foray into the world of Dungeons and Dragons. At some point I may write more eloquently on the subject of spreading D and D to the masses, but for right now I will just say that this is my own personal prime directive, and the Encounter program allowed me the chance to do that on a scale heretofore unimagined.
Including cups of tea.
An emergency supply of Yorkshire Teabags (not a patch on the old PG) was found in a local Delhaize that evening (where it is also marketed as some sort of exotic beverage with a pricetag to match), but everything British I have ever found in Delhaize mysteriously stops being sold there within a month or so, so it wasn’t long before I was back on the Liptons….
I'm glad it worked out this way. I'm glad for him. I'm even more glad for me. I'm sure that he will appreciate a little continuity in his life. I know that I do.
+40 10 54 , -104 43 30
The Jesters – One of the funniest Australian shows in years that unfortunately got a tad repetitive as the season went on. Still, having Mick Molloy on our television screens being funny and not sitting awkwardly in a tie for some dodgy Channel 9 Daily Show knock off is always a plus. A second season is in the works so hopefully they can bring back the funny, also fingers crossed they get a bigger budget; it got tiring spending all of our time in poorly lit boardrooms. I know it’s a FOXTEL show but surely somebody over there knows how to turn on a light.
In it, Fraser sets out his concerns about a paper circulated by Lord (David) Freud, Parliamentary Under Secretary of State (Minister for Welfare Reform) to certain members of the House of Lords (this being “Models of Sickness and Disability” by Waddell G and Aylward M, whose track record on the alleged deviance of sick people -- those with ME/CFS being specifically targeted -- is documented in “Magical Medicine: how to make a disease disappear” by Professor Malcolm Hooper available at www.meactionuk.org.uk/magical-medicine.htm ).
MINDFULNESS IN THE CLASSROOM is the focus of an article at the site of the Child Mind Institute. According to the article, being trained in mindfulness can help kids increase self-awareness and self-regulation. Students with AD/HD trauma, anxiety, or autism may benefit. Read more.
While I am lucky to even have a job these days with this lovely economy we have going, I still watch what I spend on non-essential things, like lolita. Last month I set a challenge for myself to see how far $300 could go for lolita related purchases. I'd like to think I was successful.
Joe: OK! But I don't think the answer will make life easier for you.
Raven answers, “Thou sayest sooth, but this brought me to it, that I begrudged thee to lie in the bosom of Helga the Fair.”
I don't expect it anytime too soon. They just refuse to ask the tough questions that they were somehow inclined to ask, when George Bush was President.
I manage to gain composure in the car, telling both girls to shut up, and I decide to speak to the officer from the rear seat. When Jen rolls down her window, I ask the cop what the problem was (convinced that her erratic driving has been spotted and we are headed for the slammer). He tells us that Jen’s headlights are out. Jen replies that her switch is loose and that she asked her mom to fix it, but her mom hadn’t yet. The cop buys the story and begins to walk away. Then he turns around and heads back to the car (I just know he can smell the vodka in the car– yes, it was in the car in Jen’s McDonald’s cup). The cop asks if everything is okay with us and Kara responds with wailing. I reply that everything is okay and ask why he wants to know. He tells us that we pulled into the exit to Taco Bell. Genius from Above hits and I tell him that we are only here for the tourney this weekend and we are unfamiliar with the streets. He nods and buys the story. Then he tells us to get back to our hotel because it isn’t safe to drive with no headlights in the dark. We agree and thank him.
In my previous post I 'wrote' about Stillness - the ever present ... our connection with our Inner Self. If you look at a horse, it is completely surrounded by Stillness and if you enter the space of a horse ... you can feel this 'presence.'
This year, too, Cooper is pitching. I understand he’s pretty good, though I haven’t seen it myself because I missed those games due to conflict with other sports my kids play.
The maypole on the green.
Older girl (running 20 yards ahead, as is par for the course): "MOOOOMMMMM!!!!!"
What time is it now? I said, what time is it now?
I know we have "Mikado" here from the company Glico. But the taste is so different to Japanese version of Pocky. We only have 3 different tastes. Milk chocolate, dark chocolate and white chocolate. That's it!
Like her religious outlook, her attitude toward slavery was catalyzed by the ideas of Elias Hicks, who denounced the institution vigorously & urged Friends to abstain on principle from using the products of slave labor. From about 1825 until Emancipation, she never knowing used cotton cloth, cane sugar, or any other product of slavery, & she lost no opportunity in public speech & private conversation to forward the “free product” movement. (Her husband, not without considerable inward struggle & financial inconvenience, shifted, about 1830, from the cotton trade, in which he had established himself, to the wool commission business.)
7: I move too slow in relationships.
Being wealthy is about having immediate cash flow to experience life in a multitude of ways.
Who made these drawings? Could everybody draw like that? Could anybody pick up a charred stick and draw a running horse from memory? Was there a competition about who could get the anatomy most accurately? No. This was something only a few individuals were able to do. Or were even inclined to do. In the case of Chauvet Cave, we have one individual artist who left his fingerprint with a distinctive little finger, recognizable throughout. He was six feet tall. This information gives me goose bumps. An individual. He picked up his charred stick and his torch and walked to the back of the cave and drew these animals in motion—from memory. There was no need for this. Drawing did not fill his belly or build his muscles for combat, the better to survive. Drawing was a removal from the necessities of everyday life. It was not about survival, but about a new form of consciousness.
Legends Longboard Final (50 & Over)
This is a delicious cake and if you like honey in cakes, i think you will like this too. I actually made this cake twice. The first time i made it, i didnt ground the walnuts properly. I was supposed to use a food processor to do the job but because i halved the recipe i thought it was just a little amount so i used a mill instead to grind. But it was difficult to do it with a mill and soon my half grinded walnuts started to release oil and and when it was mixed with the flour, it kinda of lumpy and i knew that probably it will not turn out well. I didnt care cos i was already finishing almost doing everything. True indeed, it turned out to be fudgy in some parts of the cake, nevertheless edible and tasted very nice. Just 2 days ago, i thought i wanted to make this again, after all i find its taste good so i dont mind baking another one, making sure i use the food processor to ground the walnuts but again i did some other little mistake about the sugar but i dont think it affected the taste and the texture of the cake. It came out well this time, cakey, moist and most importantly i like the taste of honey in there. Previously, i did made other cupcakes with honey in it but i didnt like that, i found that it tasted funny with honey but not this one.
Miss Applesauce Pants and the Exploding Diaper Band!!!
Over the past couple of years I’ve become a real convert to eating dandelion leaves and other bitter plants. For me now, no smoothie would be complete without the addition of a generous handful of magnificent dandelion leaves.
As a pebble in a river
Megan explained to me that Build A Sign, just this year, had launched a sister company called
And scream out in anguish.
Accidentally found ourselves in this situation …
Ice Cube lands his greatest role yet, as the angry black captain. He is able to fully embody this role, never for a second looking or acting out of character. Handled by anyone other actor, this role could have easily felt like a caricature, but with Ice Cube at the helm, he dominates with every slap on the desk and booming yell. Without Ice Cube, 21 Jump Street would not be the perfect comedy that it is.
The cover and info on this fortnight's edition of Doctor Who Monster Invasion magazine:
･IS06
Right whales, which can weigh as much as 70 tons, consume 2,200 to 5,500 pounds of tiny crustaceans, or copepods, a day. Females do not get pregnant if they are underfed, and with good reason: They can lose up to 30,000 pounds on the journey from Canada to their southern calving grounds, and once a mother gives birth, she must feed nursing calves, which can put on several hundred pounds a day. Time spent feeding can be crucial in ensuring an animal’s reproductive success.
Tatting related:
“While Ms Beard is a supremely intelligent woman…the plain truth is that Ms Beard is too ugly for TV,” she wrote in an article for the Daily Mail.
Through social media, Roland has mastered the art of self promotion, which has helped him fill the void of the one black guy that CNN calls on for all things political. He definitely understands the art of blending news and entertainment. Make no mistake, he’s a great political analyst.
This is a recent find and I am loving every new post I read. Fairy tales, poetry, and a fantastic sense of humor puts this blog in a league of its own. Just recently, poems about informercials and a snuggie had me in stitches.
6oz caster sugar
"Don't leave me.....STELLLLLLLLLAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!"
Vonne C. rode quickly through the breezy Harlem night like sunshine chasing out the darkness. Focused, she ran her mind through every possible threat she could recall as she slammed on the peddle of her 1956 Chevy Corvette.
We were well on our way, in mild weather, to see the sights. The transportation was clean, the passengers pleasant, and the views impressive.
It's our engagement photo.
Let’s not even get started about how these game industries are already making consumers obtain an “online pass” in order to play online. Without this code you can not play the game online. This makes gamers who want to play online have to buy the online pass in order to play online. It makes sure that if you buy a used game you can play the game, but you can’t access any online play.
Live ammunition was reportedly used to disperse an anti-government protest outside dormitories adjacent to Aleppo University’s campus late on Wednesday.
Morning session
Mushroom Gravy goes well with steamed Rice and also good enough with Roti's or Naans . and Mushroom 65 can be taken as starter or nice snack item .
McIlroy, the world number two and U.S. Open champion, shot a composed two-under-par 69 to move within a stroke of the lead but the man he was presumed to be dueling with at Augusta – four-times Masters winner Woods – came close to imploding.
It’s interesting how the left ignores the inflammatory comments of Bill Maher who called Sarah Palin the “c” word. Somehow he gets a pass and his remarks have faded into yesterday’s news cycle, while the firestorm surrounding Limbaugh continues.
Jeff: Napa can go for about 3-5 years, Rutherford 5-7 and with Georges you will definitely benefit and reap the rewards if you wait at least 8 years up to 20 even 30 years!
Sometimes she feels like a motherless child
Black Pudding trotted back to the other dogs before standing in front of them and grinning.
AWR Hawkins is a conservative columnist who has written extensively on political issues for HumanEvents.com, Pajamas Media, Townhall.com, and Andrew Breitbart’s BigPeace.com, BigHollywood.com, BigGovernment.com, and BigJournalism.com. He holds a Ph.D. in U.S. military history from Texas Tech University, and was a visiting fellow at the Russell Kirk Center for Cultural Renewal in the summer of 2010.
I loved reading about your creative ideas. There are so many talented and gifted ladies out there, and I am so grateful that you took the time to share your projects and ideas with me.
“All is safe, we may proceed.” He held up a twiggy finger to his woody mouth. “Please do not speak, and try not to breathe so abominably loud.”
Conway – I’m going to mention three quarter milers and I want you to tell me what comes to mind – Jeremy Wariner.
So here is the first official Pinterest Fail found at Goodwill:
I am not gonna limit my God with my disbelief
I first saw the movie in the mid-70s not long after moving to L.A. I saw it with my ex-husband--who was just my boyfriend then. In my memory it was all shot in close-up in a white room, the lights blaring into the faces of the husband and wife, their tight smiles dissolving into loathing. I didn't care for it much back then. I had no idea, I suppose, how people who appeared so happy on the surface, could be swirling in so much subterranean turmoil. It was utterly fascinating this time around. I had to turn it off for a bit after the scene where Marianne calls her friend to tell him that Johann has left her. He already knows--had known for quite a while that Johann was planning it. My own humiliation came back to me, so palpable and present, that I got up from my chair and stood in the bathroom doorway wondering if in a second I'd be kneeling on the tile in front of the toilet. But I was okay. It was good to be reminded, in a way, of my debilitating un-doing. To contrast then with now. To see where the path began and where my feet are planted now.
So here’s to living in the best of all possible times…despite the worst of all possible stories dominating the media. — L.
If you’re looking for a micing solution that gives you great sonic reproduction, strong output without distortion and clipping with minimal EQ’ing – the SMK4061’s are a solution I would highly recommend. Overall, we were so impressed by the SMK4061 that we had added them to our permanent collection of mics. If you’re looking for more information on these and other products from DPA, visit their website at www.dpamicrophones.com They also have some great resources on mic placement and usage.
MAC Penultimate Eye Liner in Rapidblack - This is a pen-style liquid eye liner that is easy to apply, even if you have a shaky hand like me! It's the best liquid liner I've tried and has great staying power.
Melissa & Maks – 30
Anyway, back to the beer! Having a bunch of sour cherry juice laying around needing to be used up I decided to make a very bready, nutty beer to balance the acidity of the cherry juice. For a while I was considering using some of the almond liqueur/extract I made a while back in the Fat Washing post, but I decided to hold onto that for something where the flavors might shine a bit more. Instead I decided to use a spice not too many people are familiar with, but I absolutely love..Mahlab.
The people of France are outraged by the murder of three paratroopers on French soil, and four Jews in a Jewish school in France. They should be outraged. The suspect has been described as a North African with Palestinian sympathies, who has acted to avenge the children murdered in Palestine. Only yesterday, pictures of neo-Nazi soldiers were displayed to evoke images of the holyhoax. This entire atrocity has been orchestrated to maximise the emotional impact. Children; Nazis; Palestinian 'terrorists'; Al Qaeda. This is so well scripted it could be the latest French thriller film. Alike to the entertainment film industry, it is entirely contrived.
I guess I am just a sucker for my kiddos. Who knew, huh?
“I am looking forward to playing the full 19-game season and winning the Super Bowl,’’ Davis said.
Due to the manhattan kansas motels of Kansas wedding limo doesn't turn up. Do not pay or sign any deal with unfair and unreasonable insurance prices. With a limousine, visitors don't have to enter the manhattan kansas motels a spot and there is less opportunity for buyers to negotiate as the manhattan kansas motels an impressive city filled with clashes, tensions, railroads, industrial advancements and more.
There's going to be a fabulous Free Prize Draw full of craftiness...............I will post a picture up as soon as it's ready so you can see just how fab it it is.
Spellbinders die templates are open in the middle which makes it super easy to position your die over a stamped image (no guessing here folks because you can see the stamped image and exactly where the cut will be). I like to lightly tape my die template to the paper - just one corner will do - so that it does not shift during the cutting process. Rule of thumb: Stamp then Cut. Also each die template allows you to make a neat embossed edge which in turn allows you to ink a fine border in a shimmery ink or glitter
Ooh, while we are dreaming, can I please have a microwave? My microwave has been broken for months. Ugh.
What seems to be totally lost on the seemingly increasingly befuddled Breytenbach is that Mandela, far from being a Gandhi-like figure who eschewed violence, was in fact a violent revolutionary who planned a Communist-inspired revolution in South Africa. This is in fact why he was jailed on Robben Island. Far from being Buddha, Mandela continued preaching violence even after his release from prison. Read here how Mandela and Mbeki seemed to approve of the chant "Kill the Boer" at a funeral, and view this video to see and hear Mandela chanting violent anti-white hate songs.
One of the best aspects of Infernal 2 is the backdrop of the Hong Kong handover. The story cycles through three points in the nineties, finally ending with 1997 and the transition of power in both the political sphere and the gangster underworld. While not as gripping as the original, Infernal 2 is still quite a good action/crime film, though both Andy Lau and Tony Leung are missed (their youthful stand-ins are poor replacements). At least there’s still the excellent Eric Tsang as Sam, one of my favorite characters from recent gangster movies.
Long as he wants to go opposite to the foe
He is referring to a ban on pharmacies selling cigarettes. This leads him to discuss tobacco advertising...
Fri - off
I regret to inform you that the threat from your government exists. It is an insidious threat, veiled in the guise of “preventing terrorism” (which, apparently, the FBI has done just fine on without arresting people at bus stops, though, there is some controversy regarding their tactics with regard to possible entrapment).
Yep, I done good.
The end of this semester was particularly unique, as it was my last school semester as an undergraduate! On Saturday April 21st, I officially completed my degree, from Mount Royal University. On Monday April 23rd, I took a one way flight to Victoria British Columbia, to digest my recent accomplishment and cruise around the island on my two-wheeler!
Josh Brolin’s Monologue
What do you do for reading interventions? iStation
We stayed in a B&B courtesy of AirBnB – a website where you can stay with real people, well worth a look if you get the chance. Staying with our host Joy in her handsome seafront Georgian townhouse really made the trip. It was quite unusual staying with someone you’ve never met before but I guess it’s the same in a traditional B&B, except this is someone’s house but it worked our for us really well.
There is more time for yourself and your family.
Note on accommodation
* a bag of cough drops
I don't know if this is necessarily a good thing, but guarded optimism has been my approach to many things in my life. If you don't expect too much from the beginning, you won't experience quite so much disappointment if something doesn't work out, right?
Inside the ship, I meet a whole crew of people just like the grey-eyed man. I think to myself – friend or foe? Do I really trust these people? As soon as I think this, however, Young Master’s hand slips through mine, and gives it a sharp squeeze. I know I can trust him.
はち：この本は厳しい現実を把握するのになかなかよさそうだね？
“We are all behind you, Jessica!” was TV host-eventologist Tim Yap’s assurance for the half-Filipino chanteuse.
Diecut Machine: Cricut Expression by Provo Craft
I quite like some of what William Nicholson has to say in yesterday's Guardian on the issue of class and fiction. There is now a prejudice against middle-class characters and settings in novels, he says, and his anatomisation of how this came about seems to me about right:
Our beloved ancestors, blessed be.
These two photos were taken in the delightful hilltop village of
you carry there...
women.)
Will cast her away… Run away.
Where: Internationalist Books & Community Center, 405 W Franklin St, Chapel Hill, NC 27516
Just a quick note to say that everyone should check out this video by Oliver Metz , a student at the University of Applied Science Kaiserslautern. I think it’s all kinds of grand.
Cooking dinner is another thing I'm rediscovering. For a long time, we survived on the generosity of others. But when your baby can roll over all by itself, and you are able to wear real clothes and take a shower, people expect you to cook your own dinner all of a sudden. Meal planning and the impending spring have both lit a fire under me to get more done in the kitchen. I looked down last week and the baby was playing in her neglectisaucer
Back to present, sira kasi ang coffee machine (hindi sya vendo) sa floor namin, kaya back to timpla mode lahat ng gusting magkape (so primitive hahaha joke lang nadala lang ng commercial ng suka lol).
Cruel and inevitable, as day passes into night.
A: I am a Certified Wedding Consultant, who has had over 10 years of corporate Marketing experience and over 4 years in social events. I have done weddings and events both in the San Francisco bay area as well as the Hawaiian islands, but I am also available to travel anywhere my clients want to have their events at.
‘A considerable amount of money will have to be expended on the Somerset and Dorset Line to improve it and make it efficient for traffic purposes, and I have no hesitation in saying that the traffic to be carried over the Somerset and Dorset Line in connection with the South Western system and the Midland as well as locally,
To ask digital edition questions specific to your magazine or for a free, confidential review of your digital product, please contact your Publisher Relations manager.
Happy Creating!
Just when you see the shard, Kid starts to hallucinate and the entire story gets turned upside down. The game takes you back to the Rippling Walls like the beginning of the game, and Kid’s asleep in his bed. “There’s a Kid who’s all right,” Rucks says, “all tucked up in bed, snoozin’.” You play through the level again but everything is not as it seems. The enemies are friendly until you start attacking, and an old god you encountered earlier in the game appears and begins to charge you. “The gods are all undone,” Rucks says when you smash him out of the way. Then Kid gets to where his hammer once lay in the road, but a shadow of himself appears in its place. When you finally defeat your shadow, Rucks says, “His friend has come undone too.”
Levy Adcock is a player I feel projects much better inside at the guard position than his current position of offensive tackle for Oklahoma State. Adcock shows good mirroring skills and patience while also displaying surprisingly nimble feet. Adcock’s feet allows him to shuffle and re-set well, allowing him the ability to recover if beaten initially. This agility is also one of the reasons that Adcock shows nice ability in riding out his defenders past the pocket and away from the quarterback. The other thing I really appreciate about Adcock is his awareness as he is quick to help out his team-mate inside with chip blocks if his zone is clean and clear of threats. The thing that makes me feel he will be a better fit at guard is his anchoring ability and overall athleticism as he is quick and agile enough to move left or right and re-set and is a very difficult man to disengage from due to his functional strength. Once locked on and engaged Adcock looks to be a very hard object to get around let alone move. This is due to his nice wide base and solid leverage, although I did notice a few times that he got more jersey and could have been flagged for holding but wasn’t. Adcock excels in pass protection and I have little doubt that this will be his strongest suit at the next level, whether he sticks outside at right tackle or not. Run blocking is another question as he is not used in this capacity all too often, however I have liked what I have seen when he is asked to block in the running game. I have been told by Oklahoma State fans that followed the team closely that Adcock was the offensive lines best run blocker so that is a good sign as well. Nonetheless, this will be something to keep an eye on during the Senior Bowl and leading up to the 2012 NFL Draft. One area Adcock could improve on happens when he drops his head upon contact. This makes him susceptible to defensive lineman who can execute push-pull moves to disengage from Adcock’s firm grip. Overall I am a fan of Levy Adcock and think he will make for an above average guard in the NFL once he learns the positions and adapts. Adcock could also prove to be a spot-starter at right tackle in the NFL from time to time, which should increase his value as well and make him a solid 2nd day pick.
Don’t wait. Do it now. Start going to see theatre…watch a lot of film….and really watch the acting. Learn from watching. Audition….take acting classes…read books…learn as much as you can. Ask questions. Tame your fear. Move outside of your comfort zone. It is frightening to audition, it truly is. That’s why you have to calm your nerves. Audition for everything. Do THEATRE. Seriously, I have learned more about acting just doing it than reading books. Do some extra work and really watch what is going on. When on the set, they really expect you do know what you are doing so the more prepared you are, the better.
The bill is pending in the House Ways and Means Committee, whose chairman, Rep. Bill Faison, sees the moratorium as an attempt to protect the powerful cable monopoly. Faison, a Democrat who represents Orange and Caswell counties, is meeting Wednesday with representatives of the telecommunications industry and local government leaders to discuss options.
We have a monthly budget that I manage. Every month I budget $50 for dates. Just $50 for the entire month, but we are able to do it! For 3 of the 4 dates we do cheap places like a pizza buffet or dinner at a local deli (Jason's Deli is our favorite). At the deli we are able to share a large meal, and the buffet ends up being $5 a person so each time we make it in and out for somewhere between $7-$11, even if we take baby boy! We save the rest of our budgeted date money for our once a month fancy date, this time we definitely leave baby with his grandparents and we get all dressed up to go to a nicer restaurant.
Papers: Watercolour paper, Georgia Pacific cardstock, Echo Park
The best way I’ve found to remember a swim set is either to:
Among the issues blighting BN’s efforts to garner more support include a civil service pay revamp that has gone awry, the National Feedlot Centre (NFC) scandal involving a minister’s family, and the Lynas Corp rare earth refinery operations which has seen growing opposition to its plan to keep radioactive waste in the country.
In other words that countless Human Beings make God(s) in their own Image.
That disparity between the Big Apple and Chitown is most evident in Indian food. The “Indian” section of NYC is small, and the food barely okay. In Chicago, on the other hand, we have a huge Indian area, centered on Devon Avenue on the far north side. It goes for several miles, and is full of Indian clothing and DVD stores, Indian groceries, and, of course, Indian restaurants. I believe I’ve said before that I think the three greatest cuisines of the world are French, Indian, and Chinese—especially from Hunan and Szechuan—and that’s not a ranking. In Chicago one can get Indian food equal in quality and authenticity to the stuff I’ve eaten all over India.
*I’m sure that this was intentional but the transition from Betty struggling to fit into her dress and then begging off going to a charity event to Don zipping Megan – slim Megan – up was a nice touch.
Under the Clinton administration the very last piece of that protective legislation the Glass-Stiegel Act, was totally destroyed—thus clearing the way for Bush & the Bandits to begin what Obama is now putting the finishing touches on.
Thirdly, Your Book is available for free download on many different sites on net…if someone want to download one just have to run a search on net, then how could one defend against privation or copyright.
Meantime here are some useful tips on business and water policy/actions from the UN CEO Water Mandate which I cut and pasted as notes in a needless effort in case I had to repeat them as my own ideas during tonight's dinner.
So, use this power to your advantage. A hint to being in the zone of “good feelings”? Start being grateful and feel love. Love and gratitude are the universal currency. It buys (attracts) you anything and everything.
In just a few days I'll be starting two more classes. I am happy to report I received an A in my color and composition class. I am less happy to report the B I got in my drawing class. I think I should have been graded on progression. I really hadn't worked with charcoal at all beforehand, and by the end of the class I had begun to like it and show a good amount of mastery. C'est la vie. I think the grading was actually done on the body of work presented instead of progression. The thing is that compared to some people in class my work may have looked like complete crap.
In taking the pulse, the Chinese therapist feels three pressure points along each wrist, first with light pressure and then with heavy pressure, for a total of 12 different pulses on both wrists. Each pulse is thought to indicate the condition of one of the 12 vital organs.
Happy Wednesday everyone! It's Julie coming to you from the Colorado Rocky Mountains. I am your hostess for the week. I want to thank everyone who participated in our challenge last week. We so enjoy visiting your blogs and galleries and seeing all your fabulous creations. We are very excited to see what you come up with this week.
URAN 2 —
_____I may not be the sexiest woman out there but DAMMIT I'M FUNNY and I have big tits!
In pieces strewn around my apartment.
The John Deer recording on Royal American is particularly interesting because it is, in fact, a cover version of a single released in 1971 by the group C-Company Featuring Terry Nelson (an Alabama-based radio DJ), which sold over two million copies and hit number 37 on the US Billboard charts. Unsurprisingly, neither of the Gene Marshall recordings troubled the charts.
Hmmm... wait a moment. This is maybe not the fairytale love at first sight story you were expecting?! But it's the truth! I was not attracted to my husband when we first met. Perhaps because I was kind-of seeing someone else.
The answer to ‘should I go?’ has become yes. It will be better than doing what I normally do.
Members still talk about the only time a woman got over the club's front threshold. One night an unknown elderly bloke pulled up in a Bentley and doddered in with a fur-coated peroxide blonde half his age, before being frantically but gently ushered out.
business back into a booming status to serve Fayetteville and the pets of deployed soldiers).
Egomancers are able to sense magic in others. This is one of the first lessons an apprentice magus learns, and unless the would-be egomancer shows talent in the detection of the ebb and flow of magic energy, their training ends there.
My therapist said yesterday that sometimes the simple act of saying something aloud can take it's power to keep you stuck away. Being able to talk to Debbie every week and to feeling safe to come here and share with you is so very wonderful. Knowing that you understand makes me feel so much better.
Hey ramblers!
Per te sciamus da Patrem, noscamus atque Filium; Teque utriusque Spiritum credamus omni tempore.
I love the look of organized shelves, don't you? There is something wonderful about having things in there place and put away in an organized matter. I am definitely better at this in certain areas of my home--food storage I like to keep nice and tidy, garage is organized and clean...however, my bedroom closet, not so much! So, those areas I like to keep organized, my husband has been sweet enough to build shelves for me so I can keep things looking nice.
grace receive in this our day,
(without his buddy Joe Dirt)
As far as I know, there are three Fujipet models. The camera I will focus most of my attention on is the original 120 roll film camera as seen on the front page. It takes 12 6x6 shots on a roll of 120 film, color or black and white. It was first introduced in 1957 (Showa 32) with production ending in 1963 (Showa 38). There were minor design changes and a few different colors throughout its life, which I attempt to catalogue on the Camera Gallery page.
Apparently he needed a break after the end of Deluxe, and he has spent a lot of time in Buenos Aires. He sings the last line of this song twice, first with a Spanish accent then with an Argentinian accent!
Reality looms into action
24. Good To You (produced by Kanye West)
I am so freakin lost and confused and I hate it, hate it, hate it! And what really sucks...my next class is the same thing, level 2......aaaaaaaaaaaargh!!! Bad, bad timing for this class.
Reading articles -- Camilla as Charles's wife doesn't like to do the royal duties (which Diana was SO GOOD AT, that she actually ticked off Charles and some of the other royals by simply being so Damn Good At Her Job);
March 2012) is the second book in my cycle of three novels set on Hayling Island. So the soundtrack includes the sounds of the Island – the tide pulling over the pebbles on the beach, the wind in the pines, the rattle of the shrouds from the boats moored in the channels. But each of the three books in the cycle
I love to watch bulbs planted last fall burst forth in glorious bloom and color.
Now I’m not writing this to imply my life is all ‘skip through the field of daisies’ fun. I’m writing because I need to figure out fun without extra calories. Or maybe a budget on how many ‘fun days’ a gal can havein a week.
Went to see kira’s people. Nice night out. Meeting with them tomorrow for a meal and a chat.
Thanks for stopping by..............and have a wonderful weekend!
Isn't this just the cutest image? We have a new collection of digis today at StampFairy and they are my favorites of all time. So perfect for the guys and this one is for my brother who is a fishing freak!
“What?” She couldn’t hear anything with the helmet on.
You may visit Applied Wing Chun at:
I said to him, "It must be nice to get to come to Target needing ONLY ONE ROLL OF WRAP!"
It turns out that after my ex fiancé and I called off the wedding, Tina and her husband got divorced. How friggin’ convenient. And now they are seeing each other. There’s a constant “Really With Seth and Amy?!” SNL skit running through my head:
Take advantage of the opportunities available
Copy and Paste paper 5 from the kit, Image, Resize by 80%, Position to your liking,
Tezu
Just in time for Christmas comes the Collection of Elizabeth Taylor on the auction block at Christies. Collectors and well-heeled fans of the late star can purchase over 1000 items that include jewelry, couture and art starting on December 13th through the l6th. The collection is expected to fetch 30-50 million and it's all here -- Bulgari, Givenchy, Van Cleef & Arpels, Valentino and even Warhol.
I’ve been unschooling for 4 years now.
Last time I had a Keratin treatment done it took HOURS so I told Justin that I would just eat at work before the appointment then see him back at the apartment around 8.
That’s it, folks! Be sure to check out more of palindromicpanda’s stuff on Silly Pudding!
A nine-piece collection of matte eye shadows in warm and cool tones.
carrots with honey butter sauce
I washed my face before bed one night with my normal face wash routine. And the product bleached the neckline of the shirt right in the center to a bright coral!! I almost cried! My face stuff has a tendency to bleach pillow cases but it NEVER bleached a shirt. And of course GAP didn't have my size anymore even of different colors.
Thank you to those of you who commented on my last post. As you can see I chose OPI Lucky Lucky Lavender in the end so I stuck with the paler colour some of you suggested. I was actually so undecided I put OPI My Private Jet on first but decided I didn't want a dark polish on (shock horror!!! I always wear dark polishes!!!) so I took it off and chose this one instead.
A fixed rule for number of photos you may place one card, because a different image file types, the picture of the packaging and contents of each file's size will affect different amounts is not.
So, what of organised crime in Odessa and Ukraine? Firstly it is important to recognise just how fluid it is. I know only two players in what can genuinely be identified as the “Odessa mafia”. We will call them Mr A and Mr V. Ignoring their foot soldiers and the numerous black shinning BMW X5′s and X6′s they tend to drive around in convoy everywhere, their nefarious activities and profiles are otherwise very low key to the likes of you and me. Minnows are never much interest to sharks and even though sharks are interesting to minnows, they are not always easily identified as being a shark and often it is too late if you do. How I know these two individuals is really rather irrelevant, it is enough you know that I do.
Two training supervisors, Tom Feeney and Matt Ryan, have been exposed by 5 current and former air marshals as having created a discriminatory board game that was particularly disparaging of gays, lesbians, African-Americans, and veterans.
File size: 103Mb
You think you can kow tim the situation by outsourcing the fiery rhetoric and bloody threats to the fighter cocks like Perkasa’s Brahem Ali and KJ? That’s a mistake.
If you do the same, are you any better? Can you claim any moral, or even ethical, superiority? Why should people listen to you?
So why is it a draw? Because I’m such a wuss, the ninth mouth, and I still can’t decide.
I wanted so badly to scoop that little girl up and take her home with me..... And her name is even close to Alexis.
Now That You're Ready
Till there was no bed in a monk’s house, nor food that man could find.
Michael Shannon has hit an all time high in his latest film with director Jeff Nichols. Take Shelter is the story of a hard working family man named Curtis who begins having dreams and at times what he feels are visions of the beginning of the end of the world. Unknown whether he needs to protect his family from these events or if he is the danger. His attempt to learn about what is happening leads him back to his schizophrenic mother and to a doctors office. After his actions and feelings cost him his job and quite nearly his family he begins to accept the help his wife pleads with him to get.
The restaurant is small and intimate, with a warm and very modern decor, featuring artwork hand picked by Charles Hamade including bronze wall sconces and walls of Mexican pebble. Hamade is a sculptor in his spare time and has a very keen eye for aesthetics.
After a lovely weekend with friends in Edinburgh, which involved lots of catching up and a trip to see An Education (go and see it!) i'm now making my way to the north of Scotland for a few days. Though being sans internet until next weekend gives me slighty clammy palms i'm relishing getting away from the city and having time to get through the stack of books that always get pushed aside by procrastination when I'm at home.
2. How Many Monkeys were we practiced counting to 10 (stapled in as a book inside a book)
Now world is changing , more and more importance is being given to the conservation of natural , god given things. HTO is one of these natural cartilage preserving technique . This should be used in abundance in suitable persons to provide relief to arthritic population our country ( rather whole Indian subcontinent ) who has different social customs then west.
So, the whole thing stinks of opportunism or at the very least mismanagement and incompetence. In the end the policy on charity tax relief isn’t that bad, the principle behind it is to ensure that the tax system applies equally and that even those who are earning at the high end of the scale pay the relevant levels of tax. In the end, the effect on charities is regrettable but the policy is in the right frame of mind. In fact the impact on charities doesn’t make it the end of the world, personally I have doubts that the majority of charities operate effectively, in my opinion there are a number of charities which have become too bloated… in particular I fail to see how the operation of charity shops is an efficient method of raising money for charities due to high overheads such as rent (albeit discounted) and utilities, insurance etc. (Please do correct me if I’m wrong on this…) Further, there are a number of charitable organisations who have a large number of staff employed and high levels of bureaucracy which leads to less of each £1 donated actually going to charity. In the end maybe changes such as this will lead charities to streamline and make their processes more efficient so that less money is spent on the admin and marketing aspects of the charity. Either way, it seems that the government will be consulting on the issue to try and reach a more agreeable solution working with the charity sector and philanthropic donors.
I’ve heard about a new movie about video surveillance made in France. ‘Aux yeux de tous’ (by Cédric Jimenez) is the story of a hacker hijacking the video surveillance network in Paris (accessing both cameras and webcams) and keeping an eye on the city. He carries out an investigation about a bomb attack. The filmmaker was saying that after watching his movie some of his friends confessed they had put some tape on the webcam because they were afraid of being watched. Here’s the short trailer.
On each occasion (apart from the time my eye was swelled closed), my only shield against all this misery has been a manuscript. I’ve been able to tuck myself inside my story, close the trap-door, turn out the cruel hospital lights and light a private candle. I’ve been able to unhear the yelling and the moaning, unsee the blood, to fade far away and quite forget the ugliness and pain.
Some times when I look in the mirror, it’s hard to see my story. Every year, around this time, I start getting more introspective and begin to reflect on my life and where it’s going.
Seriously, I’m honestly baffled and if you go back and listen to the comments you will be too. There’s a build up of how Mog Madness is going to get slam dunked, and that he’s going to do the complete opposite of showing support for it…but to me it falls flat of doing any of that. Keelhaul says it’s just not the same using MogIt versus seeing the outfit in the natural environment of the game. Keelhaul clearly has a level of artistic appreciation and he’s also entirely right in this case. But why not have just said something to the effect of “that’s why I prefer how we hold the contest in-game rather than in a manner such as Mog Madness” instead? In fact, I was waiting for an elaboration on why he feels so strongly…not in favour of the in-game, but against our contest. It never came. All I got was “it just bugs me.”
While 6 cm isn’t that huge, it does seem a bit big for a small being, so I made my sister promise to pack a measuring tape into the bag she’s taking to the hospital. As soon as her little boy is born, she’s agreed to take foot measurements so that we have a sense of comparison. Maybe I’m being crazy. I will definitely concede that. But I’m curious nonetheless, and Al’s at nearly 38 weeks now, so I don’t have long to wait!!! Thankfully she’s accustomed to my craziness and willing to play along.
I was a great student - got good grades and didn't even really have to try very hard (please don't hate me!) --- I think I must have put all my energy into school.. I don't remember having any friends after elementary school - oh I'm sure I had some, but none that I would call my 'best' friend. I'm pretty sure I used books to escape....
The Jewish historian Josephus refers to Magdala by its Greek name Tarichess or Taricheae. He places Tarichess on the shore about 4 miles from Tiberias which is Magdala’s location.
Now that Dead Sara has released their first self-titled full length album, it's been a breakout year for the band. They have just made a featured slot on the Warped Tour and will be touring with The Used across the USA. Last year, they opened for Bush, and they are riding high with their first single, "Weatherman," a hard rockin' song that's been gaining a lot of buzz for the band.
* All payments collected from taxes for social security beginning now will need to be placed in a savings account for at least minimum interest and payments will be made from this account. The Federal general fund will need to budget/allot appropriate amounts of money annually into this investment fund to make payments until the system becomes self-supporting.
Check out some golden radio blunders below, including Big Al’s impromptu theme song and inappropriate dead guy joke, some words that Kellie and J-Si discovered that they can’t say, and Kidd’s freaky throat bubble!
Instead, the lessons I want my children to learn from these situations are about me...
Abdulbah has been remanded in custody and is claiming "diminished responsibility."
So many of the bloggers that I follow have been raving in their posts about an on-line course they have been taking "LETTER LOVE". I kept telling myself "you have no time, don't even check it out". Well of course I did check it out and now I am on Lesson 5!
Next time I go up to my Mum's we'll carry on with this project, so watch this space! When all the quilting is done we'll need to bind it together too, so that'll be another skill/technique for me to pick up!
Well, four days ago I started teaching two Chinese men English. They are both in their early twenties, and probably had about fifty words of English between them when they arrived (separately) in Newcastle a week ago. I didn’t know I would be teaching them until after they had their placement tests on Monday, so this was a happy coincidence.
Fear of hungry children, unable to cope.
Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Spray the inside of a 10-inch Bundt pan with Pam for Baking or Baker's Joy. Make sure the tube part is sprayed as well. Add sugar, eggs, vanilla, oil and applesauce to a large mixing bowl.
Finally, having clothes sized in an objective and not relative metric provides me an incentive to try and keep fit and trim. I absolutely hate having to buy pants in a bigger size than the ones they replace. So in this sense it is good for me as a consumer. But clothes manufacturers are in the business of trying to make consumers happy, so fudging on sizes seems a natural consequence. And thus I am led to wonder, are my size 32 pants, really 32?? Oh god, I hope so!
-label everything using label maker, Silhouette, and label paper punch
I'm going to admit now that I haven't read all of The Tiger's Wife. A degree in English Literature has taught me many useful and discerning skills, amongst which is this little gem: if you can't get past page 50, give up.Let’s just briefly note that a “skill” cannot be “discerning” and that she confuses the present perfect tense “has taught” with the simple past “taught”: this from the same post in which she suggests Obreht needs "heavy editing." Anyway, her transparency in “admitting now” that she didn’t read the novel is supposed to excuse her critical laziness. In addition, her literary education encouraged her “to give up” on texts that do not please within the first hour or so. It is difficult for me to take seriously a writer who so quickly throws in the towel when her tastes are not immediately satisfied.
Minutes passed. Then the hours. It got dark, then light again. After it got dark again, John collapsed next to Nicola. Over time, his skin grew waxy and cold.
To dream that you lose your keys signify fears of losing control of yourself or losing your position or status in life. It may also indicate unexpected changes, frustrations, and unpleasant adventures. The dream could be analogous to lost or missed opportunities.
This post may seem a tad familiar to longtime readers but trust me when I say it's different, even if the story I tell is one I've told before.
If I was it would be from eating too much cake!
Hayley’s mother Yvonne Adamson, branded the move as ‘sick’. Mrs Adamson said:
- follow me on blogger
leaving the trees standing bare
When cereal is a golden brown color and no longer wet, remove from pan and put on a plate covered with a paper towel to cool.
Last week, Chris and I went down to London for three days to celebrate his birthday! We ate lots of yummy food, did lots of shopping and even fit a little bit of sightseeing in! Our first stop was the Ice Bar – a friend at work recommended it so I booked our tickets online a few days before. It was a very fun experience! 40 minutes in a -5 degree cocktail bar wearing an Eskimo hood and gloves! We managed to drink 5 cocktails each (they were only small!) and after 30 minutes the tips of my fingers had gone numb so we had to leave! It’s definitely worth a visit – I paid £25 for two tickets and your first drink is free!
You can place your pinky finger on your chin for balance. Starting in the middle and going down to the corners can make lips look “droopy” or sad. Start from the corners of upper lips and draw a line up to the center, using short strokes if that is easier. Pay attention to enhancing the “heart” in the center. Start lower lips from outside in. Then fill in all over with the pencil. This will leave some color should lipstick wear off.
